Just begin looking at Jesus’ words in regards to entering heaven as he say those thing produced by flesh cannot enter. Thus anything we produce like self-righteousness, pride, self-discipline,self affirmations, positive thinking, human spirituality, humanism, simply following the golden rule and etc cannot get you into heaven. No human effort will do. Only the holy, righteous and justified can enter. But no one is good enough but Christ and when the Holy Spirit gives us a heart of flesh and we are born again we are still being sanctified daily. As we walk in our newness,we are to live for Christ so we imitate him following him in all things regardless of what the world my say.
Much to all our family & friends dismay,
The result of equal toil and labour,
In other news...the weather has turned very warm here in my neck of the woods...it was 84 yesterday...supposed to be nice the rest of the week...so you will find me out in the yard...gardening...what else!!
A little bit later, he went out to his car and returned….walking thru the door just in time for one of those musical passages where we’re doing nothing much apart from circling our hips in a way that SOME observers might consider to be ever so slightly erotic.
GO PREDS.
(DDR),etc. are absolutely necessary
#10. mexican food, any and all of it
The Economist writes about the several techniques of surveillance and face recognition functioning today and reading about them can bring chills on one’s spine.
Dewina lodged a police report over the alleged assault immediately after. City police are now looking for the suspect.
Many experienced drinkers seem to regard the drinking of beer from a glass as a sort of sacrilege and it is strange that they can offer no rational explanation for their views. I have never heard glasses advocated; but I have many times heard tankards advocated with considerable violence. Yet one could say that a glass enables the colour of the beer and its clearness to be appreciated although a tankard does not."
Some poking around leads me to believe that it is probably something to do with the fact that she is running Windows 7, 64-bit on her HP portable, and there seem to be some tricky things regarding unsigned driver installation on 64-bit Windows which I didn't have time to look into. Other people seem to be having similar problems so for speed, I've taken the LibUsbDotNet install out, and you will have to do that manually, before you install the Hamster Application. You only need the runtime files, but you do need the filter driver. If anyone can make it all work as it should on W7-64, please let me know how it's done!
Wishing everyone a lovely weekend. What's happening in your corner of the universe? Whatever it is, I hope you have fun!!
Please try again,
Then on understanding: as with any text, reading the Quran is all about interpretation, interpretation, interpretation. There is no one way to read the Quran (I wish this went without saying, but it doesn’t). Houda stresses that women can take positions of secular authority, like presidency, and calls herself as a preacher, but does not question men’s religious authority, as others have. I do not know enough about the Quran to say anything about what it says (see: madrasah-related angst) but for someone who’s all about drawing a line between religion and culture, Houda comes across as inflexibly entrenched in certain cultural norms, particularly with regard to the hijab and marriage. Houda’s view is just but one, and it would do us all good to stop handing down interpretations as fact.
10. No Love No Hope No Fear
Right now I’m rocking my recently acquired Grateful Dead purse. Before that I had a red pleather purse, because I love the color red. I also have a messenger bag which I LOVE and it even says “love” on it in a hippie-ish fabric with a dove for the “o.” I use it to carry my laptop and my writer’s portfolio because, you know, I’ve got to look as if I know what I’m doing with this whole freelance thing. They are the biggest purses I’ve ever owned, and sadly, I carry them mostly empty.
And then one day I got disheartened by my other church community. I spent the whole afternoon crying with them judging me. so I decided I cannot be with them. I cannot be with people who looks at me differently. So I stopped going to this church. I kept on the Catholic practices. But since I was never baptized, I don’t feel it real at all. So I prayed for guidance and discernment. I prayed for that day – my closest friends, my then boyfriend, my first friend priest, baptized me, an adult, along with 4 other children. I was so happy and full of purpose!
55. There are 158 verses in the Greek National Anthem.
We’re getting so close to the end of days it isn’t even funny. You know it’s desperate times when you see something like this in the Vancouver Sun. Special thanks to moongirl for pointing it out. This ad showed up in the Tuesday edition in full colour, spread across two full pages.
I made her outfit based on a design for Unoa sisters from Dollybird vol.16. Naturally, I upscaled and adjusted the pattern for Kagura. The blouse collar turns out too wide. Overadjusted it. (T_T) The layered shorts fits quite well though. (^_^)
After a military exercise in Grenada: Success seems to shine on us and I thank the Lord for it. He has really held me in the hollow of His hand.
Curry leaves- 2 to 3 sprigs
Hope you are all well. Thankfully, most of the snow has now melted away. Still pretty cold though and the fog is a bit of a nuisance. Roll on the summer is all I can say.
*The writing. While the story was less than great for me, the writing was very good and quite beautiful.
You can find out what happened when the Tardis scanned the Master, and take our Time Traveller's Quiz to see which era of history you belong in. Plus, try your hand at making a Cybermat and read about the cool pets that have appeared in Doctor Who.
When it's completed (hopefully within the next couple of days) I'm going to try and take photos of all of it before it gets sent off to it's new home and I will show you them on here if you like. Also I will explain more about it, instead of just leaving you a bunch of links.. but right now my brain is tired from the late night of creating and I'm off out for the day (and will hopefully be consuming much coffee!)
Well, a belated welcome to August. What has the weather been like? It's absolutely piping hot, very muggy and until today there has been absolute drought.
The sidebar material in includes information from Mike’s LinkedIn account as well as links to his tweets, Facebook, LinkedIn and Flickr accounts. To check up on what he’s doing, we just need to click on one of the links.
I have used Bobunny papers from the Serenity pad to cover my base card and layered up with kraft and wrapped with ribbon. The postcard stamp and sentiment stamp are by Whimsy Stamps.
This is just a glimpse of the many wonderful uses for the amazing little nut. I am going to be including recipes for dishes, skin care, oils, and breads.
“Here, let me try some of this on you,” she said.
They have consistently outsourced labor and used that outsourcing as leverage to cut workers’ healthcare and pay.
If I look at the poor royalty rates publishers offer, the changing, volatile marketplace, the long time to publication, and then add in the multitude of mistakes publishers continue to make (like high ebook prices), I'd be hard pressed to think of ANY reason to sign a book deal.
"You certainly can".
Stairway to Heaven
In America, you see people wandering around in pajama pants, for Christ’s sake. Or stained shirts and ripped pants. With hair that looks like it hasn’t been washed or combed in years. Most Americans just flat out don’t care and completely let themselves go. America has a corner on fat, trashy, disgusting slobs. There’s no question about it. Most American women dress like shit and don’t have a clue what looks good on them, assuming they even care, which many don’t. I mean, really… I know women who have bought and worn Snuggies. (For non-Americans, a Snuggie is basically a robe you wear backwards to solve the dilemma of having to take your arms out from under a blanket to reach the potato chips.)
They spend their day’s looking for the weak soul’s to corrupt and taint just so they dont feel alone.
Dear peoples who read this blog,
AUSTRALIA’S intelligence agencies believe China is hiding the extent of a massive military build-up that goes beyond national defence and threatens regional stability.
You silly, silly Bird,
Africa. South Africa, Botswana, Namibia.
1And the fifth angel sounded, and I saw a star fall from heaven unto the earth: and to him was given the key of the bottomless pit.
The Court has voted unanimously to drive patent lawyers crazy.
One startling afternoon
2 disorder
La coccinelle (f.)= The ladybird
Happy Trail Makin'
1 constant
I feel like a gigantic weight has been lifted off my shoulders...my formal observation is done! I feel like I should have a grand celebration..instead I'm blogging!
Cook on high for 4-6 hours, or low for 8 hours.
Her latest title joins a long list of achievements in taekwondo. Cinque, who hails from Ossining, N.Y., has been on the U.S. national team twice and in 2009 won the Pan American championships, held in El Salvador. She has also won several state, regional, national, and international competitions.
Have a look at the original post for a few thoughts on how these or similar places might fit into games. With the length of the list as it is, they do seem relatively underused.
between valentines day & the first week of april
Unfortunately, I have yet to get my hands on this tape but I hope to in the very near future. If you haven’t checked out Radio People yet, PLEASE DO SO!!!!
*This* one was really tough to part with. It sold so fast
6. I frequently bring my own can of soda to fast food restaurants
“Oh, I do too. I don’t have any but I like them. Tattoos are sexy, especially on men.”
Abbott approaches sleep with an ineffable sense of relief that he did not know, before having a child, what it was like to have a child - did not really know what it was really like - because if he had known before having a child how profoundly strenuous and self-obliterating it is to have a child, he would never have had a child, and then, or now, he would not have this remarkable child. Abbott's wife, were she here, might say that it doesn't quite make sense. Abbot might rub her hip lightly with the back of his hand. "That's the thing," he might say.
Teachers Left Hanging
Please pantomime ---one of the chores you do at home.
Along with climate, economy plays a role in Italian cooking. Another staple in Italy older than pasta and pizza is polenta. It is commonly used today, but long agone it was pop among the poor in Italy. Polenta was easy to make and prepare in Italy.
I’m not writing all this to get over this relationship, because the truth is, I was over it a long time before we broke up.
To Tennessee and Kentucky, to the Carolinas and Georgia to sing
Snuggling (and farting) under his stinky duvet.
The sudden lurch by a country seen as very moderate towards Islamic extremism will alarm many in the West who supported the ousting of Colonel Gaddafi.
Ta da! All done. Hudson is really interested in this one, so I think it was introduced at the right time. I like that it was free (using materials I already had on hand), non-plastic, and not over-stimuating. And if I should ever disassemble it, I can reuse the ribbon again and, of course, use the hoop for a different project.
Virtually no more software program can be essential for that android based mostly cell phones to download as well as mount virtually any web applications. On the other hand, inside the i phone you have for you to set up this iTunes previous to getting just about any application appropriate using iPhone. Therefore, within this concern the iPhone will probably absolutely loose towards the ultra androids.
There is just too much going on around me and I cannot concentrate in any of my work spaces, so I run away to write and draw each book. I need to ask for a larger advance! Or maybe the Beachmere would give me a free room if I put "This book was set in Rockwell type, and designed on a king-size bed at The Beachmere in Ogunquit, Maine." in the book.
If you can think – and not make thoughts your aim;
When Emperor Zombie threatens the safety of all life on Earth, President Abraham Lincoln enlists the aid of a mechanical head. With Screw-On Head and Mr. Groin on the job, you just know there will be flying machines to be piloted, tombs to be robbed, and weird alien menaces to be thwarted -- all that and talking dogs, too! It's pure mayhem -- and pure Mignola!Amazing Screw-on Head was briefly an animated TV show and is now available on DVD.
It happens in more subtle ways, however, especially in networking situations. Minshew illustrates with what she calls the “two smart women phenomenon”: “It’s when some very well-meaning guy introduces two women he knows merely because they’re smart and female, with no other overlap.”
In Vṛndāvana the autumn season was very beautiful then because of the presence of the Supreme Personality of Godhead, Kṛṣṇa and Balarāma. The mercantile community, the royal order and great sages were free to move to achieve their desired benedictions. Similarly, the transcendentalists, when freed from the encagement of the material body, also achieve their desired goal. During the rainy season, the mercantile community cannot move from one place to another and so do not get their desired profit. Nor can the royal order go from one place to another to collect taxes from the people. As for saintly persons who must travel to preach transcendental knowledge, they also are restrained by the rainy season. But during the autumn, all of them leave their confines. In the case of the transcendentalist, be he a jñānī, a yogī, or a devotee, because of the material body he cannot actually enjoy spiritual achievement. But as soon as he gives up the body, or after death, the jñānī merges into the spiritual effulgence of the Supreme Lord; the yogī transfers himself to the various higher planets, and the devotee goes to the planet of the Supreme Lord, Goloka Vṛndāvana, or the Vaikuṇṭhas, and thus enjoys his eternal spiritual life.
Oh and I know this isn’t a popular view amongst the beer geek mafia, but it turns out although we all think we are God’s gift to beer drinking, and think we are sticking to the man by boycotting the Kirin and SAB Miller brands (although let’s face it we all still drink their brands that we like) but the big beer companies couldn’t care about us. They want to target the beer drinker that has one favourite beer (theirs) that they buy by the slab not the beer geek who are buying a mixed dozen, and asks the bar tender ‘what’s on the rotating tap?’ You and your philandering palette are their worst nightmare.
Synopsis from YouTube:
Where is your dream destination ?
Now you're gone and my tempers getting frayed
In another scene in the movie, Frank Sinatra and Bing Crosby are singing and Bing goes into a slow, short scat -- ba-dah-dah-DAH-da-da... in the 30s and 40s style -- and Frank Sinatra stops him and sings in a playfully argumentative tone, "Don't dig that kinda croonin' chum..."
The patient was seen by various experts and her clinical condition does not fit any known classical neurological syndrome. However, careful anamnesis and the development of her symptoms following vaccination suggest a high probability that her current condition may be the consequence of vaccination induced damage syndrome (VIDS).
2 tablespoons active dry yeast
Tammie, thank you for paying attention to my drawings and paintings. Thank you for reading my words. Thank you for your encouragement. Thank you for gifting me prints of your magnificent snowflakes. Thank you for thinking of me when you drew this. Thank you for your words of comfort during my sad times. Thank you for being kind to me when I was mourning the loss of my sister Leah. Just thank you for being you, beautiful, wonderful, artistic and absolutely fabulous. Thank you.
Want to meet the candidates??Then check out this cool event happening tomorrow (Thursday, May. 3rd) at the Market Square Atrium from 5:30pm – 8pm. For more info, check out the Saint John Board of Trade website/blog. Fusion and UNBSJ’s Students’ Representative Council have created this awesome chance for you to have all your questions answered. Instead of complaining, try connecting.
Is bit of a story behind my ticket though as I laughed at my Dad because Faye had said that my ticket had arrived so after laughing at him getting stressed I go home for a BBQ (Details to follow) and sat down to a nice beer and some food when he calls to say he is ringing the PO sorting office up at 6am to see if the ticket was there before box office at 7.45 to get the ticket ready for a pick up, I grab my tickets saying they are in my hand when it occurred to me to check and they had only sent my guest tickets and not my season ticket one. Oh how he laughed...
Johannesburg - Furniture worth almost R245 000 has been attached at Police Minister Nathi Mthethwa's Cape Town office to cover the costs of civil claims, the DA claimed on Thursday.
Image ... Magnolia
Ohhhhhhhhhh. I’m up a notch.
Planners want to herd millions into densely packed urban corridors. It won't save the planet but will make traffic even worse.
You pray for guidance, only silence now meets your prayers
I have said on many occasions that I am not a programmer, so in one sense I’m not exactly the target audience for this book. However, I know just enough about coding to be able to appreciate when a book lays out examples in a clear, easy-to-understand manner, with enough comments for you to “get” what the author is trying to explain to you. Personally, if I could just get over my hurdle of not fully grasping XML (which is actually strange, because I have no problem understanding basic HTML, which is very similar), I think that this book would be a lot more useful to me in understanding how to do things in FreeSWITCH. I sort of “get” Asterisk dialplans a little bit, but for some odd reason XML is not nearly as understandable to me. I guess everyone’s mind works a little differently. If you work with FreeSWITCH and you don’t share my mental block with regard to XML, you are really going to like this book. In terms of layout and readability, I think it’s one of the best titles I’ve seen from Packt.
Well, they asked if I'd wear a pager. I felt a little silly considering no one needs my body for food and we haven't lugged around an infant carrier in 4 years. However, I also felt better knowing that I had an instant line of communication if Julie were to choke again.
By Darryl James
“Don’t be afraid,” the prophet answered. “Those who are with us are more than those who are with them.”
i only need enough to survive”
We would be grateful if you could review your policies in this area as a matter of urgency to ensure they are in line with these measures and provide mothers with the necessary support to continue breastfeeding.
The time has come and we are brewing yet another new recipe. This time its a brown ale and Graham (my boss) has designed a recipe that will be his most adventurous yet on our current kit.
Unquestionably, there are in lawyers who take advantage of unrepresented clients. For example, I once represented a woman who, in the framework of her divorce agreement – which she signed without legal counsel – waived her role as legal guardian of her children, without understanding what this meant. In another case, my client had agreed in the framework of the divorce agreement – once again, signed without legal counsel – that the mother could move with the children abroad. The agreement failed to established guidelines for the transition, a mechanism for maintaining contact for the children, or any sanctions for the mother cutting off contact between him and the children. When she simply got on a plane with the kids and didn’t tell him that she was going, there were not many options for the court to help him, and certainly he had no recourse to the Hague Convention.
I am so much more tranquil about knowing her gender than I had anticipated. The moments leading up to the cake cutting were absolutely nerve wracking. However, once I had the conclusive evidence in the form of PINK cake, I heaved a sigh of relief and breathed easy with the knowledge of a baby daughter. I love being able to call her by name, my sweet Nora.
Yeah, watching other self-published authors do well played into it. Amanda Hocking, anyone? But in the end, it wasn't the possibility of money that cinched the deal. I know it sounds sanctimonious and like complete bullshit when I say the money doesn't factor into things--it DOES, of course... but honestly, for some reason I can't compute self-publishing with making money.
However technological advancements mean that smartphones, tablets and other technologies will continue to make it easier for us to both create — and consume — hyperlocal content. The potential dominance of Facebook as a platform, and the opportunities afforded by advertising becoming increasingly localized, mean that mobile is increasingly where the sector needs to be.
wilderness center- summer days
Aaaand we are back in red with Jennifer Lawrence and the uninspired Calvin Klein. It's one of those dresses that aren't really anything. It's not a great dress, and it isn't bad. It just is. It's a dress. A dull dress.
I have written and submitted a picture book (which was under consideration but ultimately rejected for being too quiet) and I’ve written a few short stories. At this stage I feel most comfortable writing novels for older adolescents.
...I'm not putting how much to use of each ingredient because it's best to make it the way you love best.
When it wasn't there.
So everyone was pleased!
3. Those eyes. Those lips.
And then I applied them.
Upon collecting all 6 coins, which can be fed to your pet, by the way, you will be given an exclusive fridge for use in your WW home.
i forgive myself for accepting and allowing myself to place myself above rapists, thinking that they should control themselves, because I can, and that their urges should be controlled, but that mine can run loose.
I was unable to download the exercise files and called FSO support then Lynda.com. All were very patient and kind but unable to solve my delimina. I then decided to viewed the videos and used my own content as practice. It was challenging at first but my humor and persistence keep me on the winding path of knowledge. I often thought about the name of my blog and Travelicious Journey was not my first thought. I thought technology is great when it works but it has it moments as with all things in life. I had to tell myself the learning isn’t about getting it’s about the things you experience along the way…
I remember, when they laid you out,
Will you pray for Jude's recent illness? Please pray that whatever is plaguing him will resolve quickly. Please pray that this will not become a major illness. Please pray that it will not turn into something more severe.
“The government’s influenza countermeasures headquarters proposed measures for local bodies such as closing schools and maintenance of medical systems, starting on Saturday, when the first case of the influenza at a location other than a port of call was confirmed. However, following the sudden spread of infections, measures by local bodies have started to affect residents, with Hyogo and Osaka prefectures closing junior high and high schools for one week. Fears have also started to emerge that institutions designated to handle infectious diseases may face a lack of beds.
Now, you all know the rest of the story, mostly. We found a place. It was a least takeover. The lady whose lease we were taking over hemmed and hawed for a couple of months and then decided to stay. The entire time, the property management company held the job open for me.
“But making policy and technology changes while keeping cultures centered on consumerism and growth can only go so far.”
*“How Do I Wrap Up My Heart For Christmas”
If you would like to Pre-Order KAndrews Valentines Stamp Sets
If you watch the news, Room is eerily reminiscent of Jaycee Dugard, who was kidnapped in 1991 at age 11 and held hostage for more than 18 years. While in captivity, she gave birth to two daughters, who were 11 and 15 when she was discovered last year. (Ironically, a follow-up interview between Dugard and Diane Sawyer is airing today.) But Donoghue takes care to note that no one case inspired her novel, and that Dugard in particular wasn’t found until after the book published.
We did a warm up, which made me heat up...then it was a little bit of Salsa, a little bit of Tango, a little bit of Box Step, a little bit of Hip Hop moves, a little bit of free style, a little bit of Bali....and then a lot of repeat.
My communication with my parents and also friends went down after a year of being here. I talk to my parents maybe once a month over Skype, if even. My friends re-connect via social networking sites, e-mails, or when they read my blog. It may sound sad, but you actually get used to it once you immerse in your busy life in the City.
1. Buy small amounts for birthdays and holidays for the first few years. The first few years, parents get really excited and go crazy buying way too much. When you add in what they will get from other people, you just get an overwhelming mess. I bought very few toys because I knew they'd get presents and even though I did this, we still ended up with too much. I wrapped up socks, underwear and clothes along with the toys so they'd have something to open. Ian will still say,"Wow, new socks!" Little ones get bored opening presents (and then they like to play with the box). You only need a few presents to open when they are small.
Son: "I had to let my girlfriend know I would be on television."
The unofficial beginning of summer is here. Everyone should be getting their BBQ’s clean and ready, BBQ utensils out of the shed and finding those meats on sale to freeze for upcoming BBQ’s.
(SGD. ARSENIA CORONEL)
It was not my fault, I did not deserve it, I had no other options.
I know most people would not agree with this one, but I’m really hoping that Donaire and Arum would consider Darchinyan as his next opponent. The loud-mouthed yet powerful southpaw brawler was actually the stepping stone of Donaire into superstardom. Nonito was able to knock Darchinyan out last 2007, and with the win Nonito became the world flyweight champion, ushering Nonito into popularity. In an instant, Nonito’s talent was noticed and he was able to collect more wins since then. Rafael Concepcion, Vladimir Sidorenko and Fernando Montiel are just some of the notable boxers that the Flash defeated. Darchinyan on the other hand bounced back from the loss and established himself as one of the stars of the lower weight classes, making a name for himself and grabbing wins from boxers such as Cristian Miajres and Jorge Arce. The two boxers showed that they are ready to face one another, especially Vic who is very eager to avenge his KO loss to the Flash, however I think that the promotional companies of the two boxers cannot agree on the terms of the fight. So I guess, we just have to wait.
"focus on the positive"
Disclosure: I received 3 pairs of underwear for review purposes and a gift card. No other compensation was received. The opinions expressed are my own.
Separate the cake batter into six small bowls.
Note that I am not arguing here that the Commonwealth cannot regulate use of a trade mark once it is created, any more than one would argue that an estate in fee simple in land cannot be subject to regulation of its user. Rights grounded in statute may be proprietary for constitutional purposes notwithstanding that to a significant extent the conditions and extent of their user may be subject to valid regulation. By contrast, Gageler’s submissions seem to rest on an implicit assumption that the fact that user can be regulated is decisive against the proposition that those rights of user may nevertheless be proprietary in nature. In fact the preferable view of the approach to ascertaining whether particular statutory rights are proprietary in a constitutional sense is that it is a multi-factorial analysis. One may make a plausible argument from analyis of the provisions of the Act that a trade mark does confer positive proprietary rights of user notwithstanding that those rights are subject to regulation and restriction within broad but not limitless boundaries (see below).
Since the scandal first erupted in the media, Mr Yaw has gone ‘missing in action’ without even bidding farewell to those who voted for him in the last General Election.
It does not get any better from there. Loveless is going to use an eighty foot mechanical spider to kill Grant. West not only survives a fall off the top of the spider, but decides to pose as a harem girl in order to sneak back on later. None of the bad guys notice no harem girls are supposed to be on the thing in the first place.
- Tricep Extensions (8-12 each arm)
The department I'm in is technically Public Affairs, but it's a really creative department, and a really fun part of my job is that I get to decorate the bulletin boards for the month. Of course there are all of the spreadsheets and reports and conference calls that come with an office position, but the people I'm working with are really helpful and a lot of the time my supervisor or other people in the department stop by my cubicle just to say "hello!".
always white. Let not such as come in among her, that are not of her,
You can taste the bright lights
Also, as of today I've posted my comment policy on the right sidebar, which reads:
So I guess maybe now that they've been flick'd working together recently Game is gonna be on "Detox"? Or that maybe "Detox" will come out sometime this year decade?
ORBITAL - Wonky
Chris enjoyed his first pint of Guinness so much he had a second, so I drove the van home. It was only a few miles and it was the least I could do. We've got a lot of miles to cover in the next few weeks.
I merged these two digis using word, Zoe has a great tutorial on doing this and its SOOOOO easy! Anyway, I printed onto kraft cardstock so that I could have another play with my new polychromos pencils, did I mention I have 120 of them? LOL! I’m having so much fun with them my copics are being neglected.
Ascended Masters and Spiritual Beings
In my sound-muffled world I often notice other people can hear what I cannot: conversations in noisy places, quiet actors in plays, questions in meetings, a television turned down, an alarm clock, a door bell, children’s voices in school assemblies … So I tend to think about hearing when I guess most people do not. I try to sit near the stage, or when I teach I am mobile and go round the room to where people ask questions. I make sure I stand or sit to face someone who is talking to me – cues from the shape of their mouth help me a little to hear what they are saying – the sound becomes partly visible, even though only between 30 and 40 per cent of sounds are visually distinguishable. According to Wikipedia, ‘“where there’s life, there’s hope” looks identical to “where’s the lavender soap?”.’
Thanks so much for stopping by today! I hope we have inspired you to make a card AND most important to SEND IT IN! I know Karen and her family need lots of encouragement...anytime you have a lengthy hospital stay it is so taxing on the soul...even when you arent the sick person!
forms that
- He did not offer to fire some of the thousands of unnecessary federal employees that he hired
Armed with this data, White and Rosato began building a matrixed volunteer management program that that views volunteers through multiple lenses, all interconnected and each with different benefits. To ensure the most capable and committed volunteers and balance the needs and objectives of both the volunteers and Lawrence Hall, the team is reviewing volunteer position descriptions and considering a more comprehensive use of existing volunteer management software to ensure the best match between talent and function and accurate tracking of hours for improved planning. They are updating a handbook that will help to standardize volunteer management policies and procedures throughout the organization and establish a targeted recruitment plan to ensure an ongoing source of the varied skills and talents needed throughout the year.
By the mid-20th Century, nearly 1 billion dollars’ worth of gold, silver, and copper had been hauled out of Cleopatra Hill and the immediate vicinity. But, by then, Jerome had become a true ghost town. Below is a shot of the Connor Hotel, which burned down twice before this brick building was finally built in 1898. Once the classiest hotel in town, by 1931 the place was shuttered. It re-opened in the 1960’s as a flophouse. It shut down again in the 1980’s due to building code violations but has since re-opened as something somewhat above a flophouse.
"The state looks at things from a very narrow scope. I think they'll realize it's not our intention to be scandalous or deceptive," said Ardaji. D'Loughy said if the restaurant opens without the trademark, it's vulnerable to the name being used by other businesses. "They would have to challenge that and that could cost the business a lot of money."
First year is said to be your hardest.
One of the cool things happening on stage was the rhythm of the music and lighting. Throughout the entire set it was constantly flashing like crazy with the tempo with the drums. If Ben was blasting his ass off, the lights were blinking like crazy. Talk about an epilepsy check! Their show was really good, definitely the best show I’ve seen Whitechapel put on. The crowd was going nuts, circle pits, moshing, headbanging and even the Wall of Death happening on “This is Exile“. There wasn’t many crowd surfers during Whitechapel, which is a good thing for me. I fucking hate that shit. Whitechapel’s crowd was exactly what I want when I go to a metal show. Energy, just raw primitive energy. Screaming like they all just sacrificed a lamb to the gods on stage while Phil screams viciously back at them.
Is the United States government wealthy?
But Spring knocks and so have my friends and as I peer out into the joyful light of the sun I suddenly feel the urge to come out and play again.
THE dress with the STORY.
Was nothing learned from Bluto Blutarsky and company waylaying an entire college parade with marbles and drunken stupidity? Was nothing learned when Hawkeye and Trapper John boozed themselves to the gills and fought against military ignorance with verbal ballets and consistent humiliation of their betters? Was nothing learned when Carl Spackler dynamited an entire golf course into oblivion to destroy one gopher?
I would want to sit down with Jesus Christ, Martin Luther King Jr. and Denzel Washington. They are all an inspiration. With humility, these men selfishly gave themselves to the world through their actions, drive, words and character. I would certainly gain a great deal of knowledge if I ever had the opportunity. Those findings, would be a monumental benefit to those around me and myself.
Resist the urge to quote contest reviewers in a query, particularly those who are anonymous. PW comments here do NOT equate to a PW review in the actual magazine. I give ZERO credence to these blurbs cause I have no clue who wrote them, and I'm absolutely convinced that no one says "this is crap" in one of these things. Not to say that yours is crap, but trust me, some of them were.
So, you can imagine my dilemma when circumstances landed me in – yep – Cleveland.
Shipping
5. At least a half-hour before dough is ready, heat oven to 450 degrees. Put a 6- to 8-quart heavy covered pot in the oven while it heats. When dough is ready, carefully remove pot from oven. . Shake pan once or twice if dough is unevenly distributed; it will straighten out as it bakes. Cover with lid and bake 30 minutes, then remove lid and bake another 15 to 20 minutes (Note: I often like a less dark and crunchy crust, so I'll usually reduce the final baking time by at least 5 minutes), until loaf is beautifully browned. Cool on a rack.
Those words from three quarters of a century ago read like an indictment of the Obama administration and the governments of Cameron, Sarkozy and Berlusconi.
Best advice ever for any author.
This week our challenge for you is simple! It's a sketch challenge!
Tuesday, November 22nd – “Bite Prevention Program” with Therapy Dogs
Cox just smothered Romo blasting through the middle, that was a DANDY.
Whatever you chose to do, whether it is at home or out on the town, have fun with it. Rejoice in spending time with your loved one. The morning will come soon enough and life will return to its normal crazy state.
Primus Too many puppies US
The political commentator John Olav Egeland said that Geir Lippestad and the other defense lawyers worked hard in court to make Breivik appear as rational as possible. The purpose of this was to have him declared sane, as well as “to spread the responsibility for the actions Breivik has done.”
when the oil is warmed add the meat substitute, allspice, cinnamon and dried mint
November 25 - Judy Lewis, actress (Barbara Vining on "General Hospital"), 76
Spencer and all his invisible friends.
Leave in the pan for 10 minutes, cut into bars while still warm.
A lot of people are whining about paying $5 to use their debit card. Nobody’s making you use that debit card. You don’t have a constitutional right to withdraw money from a bank account using a debit card. It was a banking gimmick to make money off people too irresponsible to have credit cards, and people too cowardly to carry large amounts of cash. It worked. A lot of people who are scared of buying cash and have no credit now use debit cards. (Nevermind that this means all their transactions are now data points for Big Brother.)
Help spread this far and wide – it should help wake people up to the fact that the establishment GOP has been cheating and that the media has been lying in order to manufacture consent for the establishment sock puppet otherwise know as Mitt Romney.
I'll try to answer that question by asking another question....
Hang the ballon on a string and put the soaked lace on the baloon. They have to overlap eachother so they will stick together and connect.
He held me and said it'll be ok.
Washington will get its first full season of pitching phenom Stephen Strasburg and has some young talent in catcher Wilson Ramos and shortstop Ian Desmond along with third baseman Ryan Zimmerman and first baseman/outfielder Michael Morse. The Nationals also have some money to spend and have been linked to free agents such as Prince Fielder and Buehrle.
I really wish these were a joke. They are not even elegant as flip flops go, with the chunky sole and gaudy looking attachment. If you aren't doing classic heels, there are much better options for flat sandals that are way more elegant.
Sarika is number one teen celebrity from bangladesh . If you are looking for her sexy hot and exclusive sexy pics of Bangladeshi celebrity actress and teen model Sarika
I can think of one time when a father didn’t intervene to help his son when he was being horribly abused. His body was pummeled, tortured and abused even more than Ron Jr.’s had been during the grizzly attack. But in this other story, the father remained silent. Finally, the son broke out with a cry, “My God, my God, why have you forsaken me.”
Elec: Bryan
-Staple Gun
What next? Death is coming quickly and I’m engulfed in painless warmth. Then with a flickering consciousness, I’m leaving my body. The fear is gone and I’m strangely emotionless.”
Good morning! It's Thursday again and time for another fun Mo's Challenge! Our sweet Pat is the hostess again this week and she has asked us to use our favorite color combo on our projects.
6. The Voyage/Have You Heard? Pt.Ii
If you then think about this in light of the recent report written by Pete Brown* on the cask ale market, which showed most of the top-line 5% decline in the cask market comes from the ‘big four’ multi-national brewers, you begin to see a slightly different story emerging.
It’s the race where my running career started, so I thought it was only fitting to return there for my first full marathon
While you're hopping, be sure to leave a comment on each blog hop posts…One of the ladies below is a mystery blogger and she will be picking one name from the comments on her blog post!!
I read somewhere that there were 900 guests and 500 bottles of champagne - not sure if that's correct, but the champagne was lovely and there was a lot of it. And delicious canapes too. Certainly it felt like 900 guests as the place was packed. We were sent name badges (posh ones - not sticky labels) and most people wore theirs, but even so it was hard to find people you wanted to talk to, or see the names of those you were talking to. Peering at someone's chest to decipher their name before making eye contact feels a bit rude!
09. Allegro
I was surprised by how easy it was to be without my computer. (I dont have TV, so it was a lot easier to avoid that time consuming screen.) A couple of times I was a little restless, but for most of it I had lots of projects going on or I was hanging out with friends. It is surprising how much you can get done without the usual distractions!
2) So now that we've established that I'm obese, I now count towards the 75% of the UK population that will be obese by the year 2030 (I'm paraphrasing...). This annoys me, because people that are really actually obese aren't getting the focus they need because someone like me, who doesn't really belong in that category, is artificially inflating it.
(b) The antenna current of a AM broadcast transmitter modulated to a death of a 40 % by an audio sine wave as 11A. it increase to 12 a as a result of simultaneous modulation by author audio sine wave . What is the modulation index due to the second wave?
I come from a country where, in my teens, sexual harassment was widespread and a common social practice—even more so, after the revolution. And in my line of work, it is clear that violence against women comes in many forms, some more hidden than others. In recent months, some pretty awful things have been said about women in the U.S., by people seen as leaders in their fields. Like freedom of expression, women’s rights are not to be taken for granted.
adapted from Joy of Cooking 75th anniversary edition
Well this was an EXTREMELY difficult job to choose our ShowCASe with so many wonderful, wonderful submissions. We thought that everyone should be congratulated on a brilliant inky job!
Launching in May, STAR TREK: THE NEXT GENERATION/DOCTOR WHO: ASSIMILATION2 will feature fan-favorite villains the Borg and the Cybermen as they create an unholy alliance resulting in potential disaster for all humanity. Captain Jean-Luc Picard and the crew of the U.S.S. Enterprise find themselves joining forces with the Doctor and his companions, with the fate of the galaxy hanging in the balance.
The lack of specific responses from across the Senate didn’t surprise Sen. Bob Menendez, D-New Jersey, the other Latino in the chamber.
Good Monday morning people! It was my turn to choose the challenge theme this week at Pollycraft Monday and I decided to go with a sketch! Before I show you the sketch though, I just wanted to say thanks for all the lovely entries into Anita's Cute Critters Challenge last week! There was a lot of super cuteness! We'll be back soon to announce the winners and top 3!
At 4 minutes and 23 seconds into the call I hear a phone ring in the background. He says it's his cell and he needs to grab it. Whatever. You called me buddy. He proceeded to take the call. I watched the time tick away on my phone which records the length of calls. Thirty seconds... forty five... a minute... a minute ten... patience... a minute thirty... patience evaporating... a minute forty five... ahhhrrrggg... my fingers on the release button... two minutes and he's still yapping... click! I'm out.
4. Alcohol
Despite the label that puts this out, Grabbel and the Final Cut are much more on the noise pop side than shoegaze. Look no further than the A-side "Psycho Popsong". The name alone gives away the band was trying more to create distortion filed pop than harsh feedback infused bliss. However, that's fine because "Psycho Popsong" happens to be a fucking incredible noise pop classic. Pure post Psychocandy era Jesus and Mary Chain excellence oozes from the speaker. The most perfect earworm of a ringing riff is layered with beautiful distortion as singer Stefan Zachau utters in pitch perfect English morbid metaphores abou life and death better than most of the band's UK counter parts could at the time. The song hits right in that part of the chest that tells you "I am listening to something truly incredible".
This is one reason why I find the Psalms and the whole Bible so meaningful. They do not promise us a rose garden with no thorns, a journey from one mountain top to another with no valleys. The Bible is honest. It tells it like it is. Sometimes we will have to walk through dark valleys of loss, of grief, of pain, of death.
I post each Sunday evening my Cake of the Week and invite you to do the same.
2011 will be a year of doing those things that interest me; projects… jobs… subjects… that appeal to my passions. They wont need to have monetary reward. They wont have to be long term. They will be flexible, enlightening, inspiring, passionate.
Do – carry a tooth brush, tooth paste, face wash, and contact solution in your carry on . I realize this requires some forethought, but I would have been a much crankier person if I had been able to wash my face and brush my teeth.
the head teacher, whom i am apprenticing will say,
You can bet that if it works, if it’s safe and if it’s easy to use, I’ll be recommending it in my workshops (and on this blog) to those who want to safely use something more on their eggs than just warm water.
One of our housemates is moving out soon so a few of us are going out to dinner tonight. We are going to a fantastic little vegetarian restaurant called Cafe Paradiso. I am not one to think it's worth spending a lot of money on food where you don't get meat (prices are on the higher end) but apparently Bobby Flay, BBQ King, went to Ireland and loved Cafe Paradiso! I have also had rave reviews from my friends so Branden and I are excited to finally get to try it.
Ha ha. I'm glad we can laugh about it.
Later that evening, the market fell under heavy gun attack minutes after explosion rocked a part of it.
John Stuart Mill 1806 – 1873
In a large stainless steel pot, add the vinegar, the water,
p.s. I asked Jeremy a few nights ago if he had any resolutions. He has never been much of a resolution-maker. So his answer was something like: Why would I make resolutions only to break them 4 weeks later? OH MY GOODNESS! Could we be any more opposite here!? I do sometimes call him "my cup half empty husband". But I love him dearly. :) I'm the dreamer. He's the practical one. It works. Cheers to a new year full of blessings!
Sheik Yousef Al-Qaradhawi: Our War with the Jews Is in the Name of Islam
As ever, the evidence that we told a story is hazy at best. But you should be able to just make out our shapes by the wagon - me illustrating Tom's wonderful story with my accordion. It was a different tale this time, though our favourite Russian witch featured again of course. This time we had a chase (with suitable Russian um-pah chase-music) through the forest, and even squeezebox-witch-snoring.
Preheat the oven to 400°. In a medium saucepan, combine the cream, shallots, thyme, and wine; place over medium heat and simmer until reduced by half, 20 to 30 minutes. Discard the thyme bundle and season the cream mixture with salt and pepper.
I don’t want to bother with the hell of becoming a 501(c)3 in time and I don’t want to be at the mercy of someone who is. We are officially a “not for excessive profit” group. We’re not in it for the money, but we need to pay the bills and our taxes.
“Ouch” is the word you’re looking for. The sweat’s already pouring down the middle of my back, caking on my shirt in spreading fractals of dried salt and discolored cotton. We all know these sanctions are bad, and even the appealed version is bad, but are they devestating? Is the monster Pete Carroll built and nurtured for nine years doomed? We won’t know for years, maybe a decade. But once it happens it’ll be like the turning of the tide: everything flows differently from there, good or bad.
All supplies used are Close to my Heart:
I love this blog, love writing about unschooling and radical education, and plan to continue writing here for the foreseeable future (hopefully with more frequency than I've been posting lately!). But at some point, this blog has morphed from being a blog where I can write about anything, to a blog very specifically focused on education (and directly related things like respectful parenting). That isn't a bad thing at all: I feel the focus and content of this blog is strong, and I like that. But it has left me feeling a bit like I'm just sticking in my comfort zone in writing almost exclusively about unschooling, and has made me feel a bit restless. I want to be writing about more different things, exploring in writing my views and experiences when it comes to other important subjects. So I was absolutely thrilled when I asked my sister Emilie if she would be interested in co-authoring a new feminist blog with me, and she said yes!
quasimodo 921
What a truly wonderful blessing to be able to trade a few coins for this priceless memory. It was the best part of the trip.
Needless to say, after I kissed Brooklyn goodbye, I hurried out to my car and sped to my local salon for an “age-defying” facial.
Is this the sort of thing that events managers are sometimes meant to handle?
But a hundredth birthday is something to celebrate. This year will see a series of events in the old street. Among others an attempt to break the World Record for the largest crowd sing karaoke! But I am sure something more typically Spanish is planned as well.
Tiffani-Amber
I shouldn’t have said it. I know better. Keep quiet when he’s drinking, Mom says, and I try. Only the words are out and it’s too late.
The bottom line is that I’m not naïve about this matter. I’m perfectly well aware of the downfall of many, even most Catholic institutions over the past decades. Happily, there are still some who hold fast to the Faith in its fullness. But what I continue to assert is that, despite the deviation of many individuals and Catholic institutions, the Magisterium of the Catholic Church has continued to teach 100% of the doctrines of the Faith. That is what ultimately matters and I rejoice in that fact. The neo-geocentrists, on the other hand, seem to find this good news vexing and so they seek to play up the Church’s difficulties to the utmost, in order to save their private “dogma”. There’s something seriously wrong with that frame of mind.
On October 16th I will be participating in the Susan G Komen Race for the Cure 5k walk. On behalf of my friend and her team Loco for LoKoh. If you would like to help me by donating please visit my fundraising page here.
Providence is selling its 10 percent share in Los Angeles- based Hulu for about $200 million after investing $100 million when the venture began in 2007, according to the people, who weren’t authorized to talk publicly.
He promised to get us a quote. And now we await that. I'm not even sure how that is supposed to be handled. Do we drive back out there? Will he mail it to us? Does he do mail? I'm going to wait a week before I call the showroom and find out what our next step will be.
Chilled sparkling wine (I usually use prosecco)
I am very happy about moving the buffet from the back to the dining room. We had to move our huge big tube tv to do that, but I actually prefer the tv in the parlor. It has a couch and is more conducive to seating large groups. Our eventual plan is to get a flat screen that will fit in the armoire (the other tv is one inch too big) so that we can close the door on it, and pretend it isn't there. Anyway, I have arranged many of our daily supplies and books into the buffet in the dining room which makes them much more accessible. I wish I had thought of it long ago.
Final Fantasy: Crystal Chronicles was one of those GameCube games which several people never really got to experience properly. I was certainly one of those people because I could never find three friends with GBAs and GameCube-GBA cables to play it with. Setting off into the thick miasma clouds to seek out small droplets of myrrh in your town’s caravan was just fine on your own, but the real adventure of Crystal Chronicles lay in its multiplayer. The same could be said for the rest of the series as well, but it’s arguable that none of its successors have really lived up to the charm or ingenuity of the original Crystal Chronicles. So as we continue GameXplain’s look into what the Wii U might bring to age old franchises, let’s see how it might give Crystal Chronicles the second wind it’s been searching for ever since it was first released eight years ago.
Pairing: YooSu, Vampire!Yoochun Human!Junsu
Lime-Cilantro Rice
Blow through my garden,
-brief come back by Santino with a rollup for a 1½ count.
and placed back into it little cup.
Crist says the entire Greer incident is "surprising" and "unfortunate" He says he didn't even know about the shell corporation Greer was using to funnel cash into his own pocket "until after Greer resigned in January." Crist's explanation for not knowing the specifics? He's too busy running the state. He can't be bothered with the little stuff.
Crabtree & Evelyn is also a recent discovery – my first purchase was only two months ago. My jojoba oil product reviews are long overdue… So many products, not enough body surface area to use them on!
Also why does it tell me that I could be getting more fiber even though I already get tons? “Eat more grains”. Um…I eat some form of high fiber grains at each meal – unless I’m calculating the serving sizes wrong it just wants me to eat bigger portions? Basically I eat brown rice or occasionally brown pasta with lunch and dinner, and sometimes some sort of sandwich with whole grain bread as a snack. Plus a small portion of whatever I had for dinner the night before as breakfast (I don’t like most Western breakfast foods, other than oatmeal).I’m confused – how in the hell could I be getting MORE grains? Also why doesn’t it let you indicate that you’re consuming whole grains rather than the processed white versions? Makes a big difference nutritionally, that.
And, last, but most definitely not least, I wanted to thank everyone who came out to F.A.B. last Saturday night for the grand opening of my store, Icing on the Kake! Hope all of you are enjoying the freebies and purchases you made and I encourage you to check the store frequently, as I’m making some major changes and (hopefully) rolling out several new products soon!
which earned her various awards. In the year 2008 and 2009, hot Priyanka Chopra starred in many hit movies like Fashion, Dostana and Kaminey. Hot Priyanka Chopra also equaled World Record of playing 12 roles in the movie What’s Your Rashee? Hot Priyanka Chopra has got a rich list of movies. In last 7 years, hot Priyanka Chopra image is sue to 37 movies.
#2. (Sweet Tooth):
This past weekend, I did the Branscum/Anderson Photo shoot, then I went with Tom and saw Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows! Now, this week I have Thanksgiving to cook on Thursday, plus two cakes, shopping Thursday night, shopping Friday morning, decorating the two cakes, baking gingerbread cookies, catching up on sleep (haha, yeah right). Saturday, I'm delivering the cakes, doing lunch with hubby, frosting gingerbread cookies.
1. Make some friends, get a life and quit being jealous of ours.
No matter how smart man has gotten over time, he still is not able to create blood. Man can’t create blood. But Why? Lol, I’m so glad you asked. Because blood came straight from God!!! God made Adam out of the dust from the ground, but blood came straight from God. Ours came from Adam but his came straight from God. There were only two men to ever walk the earth that had blood straight from the Father, Adam being one and Jesus, the other. So when Jesus’ blood was spilled it was expensive. It wasn’t infected blood.
“Now don’t get angry, but I talked to him and was saying that he doesn’t want a relationship. It’s not you (but we all know, it usually fucking is), he just wants you to know that this isn’t going anywhere.” Meredith was trying to be as kind to me as possible. She worked with Craig, that was how we met. They had a long talk after a whole week of him not calling me. He was trying to cool things off and wait a while before responding to me. He could sense that I wanted a relationship and that I was already invested moreso than he was.
Now, King describes a Christian generation that sees everything from art to writing to building stronger neighborhoods as ways to change others’ view of the world and be a witness for Christ. This effort encompasses environmental concerns, a compassionate approach to immigration and a focus on poverty.
Contact Persons
Less guns, more tools. Less fools, more learn.
Egg (organic): On sale $3.09/dz, used one = $.26
And well done Francois Hollande, you massive communist. #MarshallPlan
Reader Dave sends two photos of a barred owl (Strix varia):
The evaluation showed that vaccinated children and unvaccinated children differed substantially only in terms of the lifetime prevalence of vaccine preventable diseases; as is to be expected the risk of such diseases is notably lower in vaccinated subjects.
Rowley Kennerk - I went to high school with Rowley's wife, and have been hearing about him for years. One day a friend said that she wanted to stop by one of her favorite galleries. A few minutes later I found myself standing in Rowley’s gallery, mumbling "you don't know me, but I know your wife and I've known of you for years." Instead of pretending the gallery was closed in order to get this weirdo out of his gallery (which is what I would have done), Rowley showed me around the place and we talked about music for a while. Later, because he knew I didn't have a job when I moved to Chicago and because he's one of the nicest guys in town, he offered to let me sit in the gallery on a couple of occasions when he couldn't be there during open hours.
Kopple's camera became, with her full complicity, a tool of the strike. The rolling camera caught a great deal of violent and threatening behavior, mostly from the strikebreakers, at least according to what footage was ultimately used in the finished film. But it also may have prevented a certain amount of violence. As Kopple puts it in the Making of Harlan County, U.S.A., "no one wants to commit murder in living color." The protection the camera afforded felt powerful enough to the participants that Kopple's crew would come to the picket line and pretend to shoot footage even at times when, due to the financial or logistical problems that plagued the independent production, there was no film left to expose. This might be seen as a filmmaker's ultimate show of solidarity with a political movement- even without the chance to obtain footage Kopple and her crew were willing to risk being in harm's way.
Came home, and watched the new House, How I Met Your Mother, 2 1/2 Men and Mike & Molly :) Mondays are such a good day for US TV ;) All shows were brilliant, particularly Mike & Molly, was laughing quite a lot while watching that :) The new House was very good too :) Can’t believe we’ve only got like 6 or so episodes left EVER :( I also watched another episode of Grey’s Anatomy, which was very good :) It’s like House, but different. Can’t decide yet if it is good different or bad different, haven’t watched enough to make a final decision. One thing’s for sure: I do like Medical Dramas ;) This is my third, the other one being Monroe, which was actually my first, but because it’s British and only had one series so far, there’s only been 6 episodes. New series being made at the moment I think though :) No Explorers tonight, which is what allowed me to do all this with such ease time wise :) I also had to polish the new tiles for the new toilet room downstairs (I’m sure I’ve mentioned we are having it down up? Well, work properly starts tomorrow, all that’s happened so far is the old room’s been ripped apart, but toilet and sink still working, just floorboards and tiles come :D). Then we watched House, my laptop died, and that’s all :) Get ready to hear all about how I failed the Geology exam tomorrow :) I’m gunna skedaddle to get some sleep for that now :)
And getting taller by the day. Never seen such long legs!
Abide time
It made me smile to see your faith in Me!
Now that I've worn myself down I can get back to some writing.
It must be understood that President Cleveland did not allow the government to provide assistance to the wealthy either. One of the central tenants of the Republican economic program was direct assistance to business, mainly in the form of bounties and subsidies, much like Obama’s “loans” to green energy companies. Cleveland opposed such ventures. He stated in his second inaugural address in 1893 that such direct assistance “burden the labor and thrift of a portion of our citizens to aid ill-advised or languishing enterprises in which they have no concern.” Corporate leaders who thought they had a friend in the White House found out just how wrong they were.
So, I don’t want to love again
“I just don’t want to be a bitch/asshole.”
2 days a go a Belmont man was found murdered in his bed….now another body has been found in Belmont with a bag over its head….repeat after me, “The SoE was a Success”…..”21st Century Policing is Working”……”We Have a Comprehensive Crime Plan”.
Phoblacht na hÉireann
Last night was Ben's last shift. Now he has four days off, and even better, today is his birthday. My husband is THIRTY-ONE years old! weeee! In another five years that'll be me, but no matter. I'll make 31 look young n hip. just you wait.
I have also found out that bikers come in all definitions:
–COMMON TERN, Cattleland Slough, RR252, N of SR 564, same
Fred feels misled.
Bartholomew (Nathaniel):
24 California Dreamin'
Sometimes, just before my IT'S TOO QUIET mom-alarm goes off, I'll find the two of them hiding under a bedspread together, laughing hysterically at each other. It's beautiful. It's adorable. And it lets me finish the laundry before we all suffocate under it and die.
Conservatism and cognitive ability
Thursday... Mt Ventoux on bikes (electric which helps...) Another breathtaking area of Provence...
The Organized Kitchen Label Kit is 11 documents in an easy to use, print and label format - the ideas are endless. Get ready to label your entire kitchen - canisters, spice jars, dry storage containers - and with plenty blank labels, you can label other things in your home as well. You can print the labels on clear label sheets, vinyl, white sticker paper, colored paper, printed scrapbook paper......
PAM@CDC
Stuart Wood – Guitar
Keep your eye's peeled on the blog tomorrow as you'll be able to check out the entire May/June lookbook!
Kuee (V & G), Kim Dae Ho (G), Lee Jung Min (B), Kang Seung Hyun (D)
Marlene: Besides writing, do you have any other passions?
Joining Fonda is Vera Miles in the role of Manny's wife Rose. Also known to Hitchcock fans for playing sister to Janet Leigh in Psycho, Miles is utterly gripping in the role of a very flawed woman. Rather than play it all Hollywood, the film shows the true-life fallout of Ballestrero's plight and the effect it has on his spouse. Rose is a damaged character, and her arc, as brilliantly dramatized by Miles, is another testament to the unblinking realism of the picture. No easy way out here.
For a moment it seemed like 9/12 had brought about an amazing togetherness and spirit in this country, but it didn't take long to disintegrate and go awry. Let's try to make this 9/12 something better.
Softly warms my mouth
What had been discovered in my womb was pre-cancerous cells and it was best to take no chances.
If you haven't picked up a children's book lately, check this one out. The story is lyrical and the illustrations are beautiful.
I’ve created quite a few things the last couple of months which i will have to start showing…lol
In 1993 the DEP rescinded the 4.2 mgd. In the late 90's the town began an Environmental Impact Report that had a dozen changes up to 2007. The Cape Cod Commission got involved. Nothing was finalized although a conditional certificate was granted.
After a while, the beginning of a successful writing career, many local speaking engagements and 24,000 followers later, I'll be back at THE REaD CAT BOOKSTORE for its last day of business at this location.
I told her it must have looked odd,
TIP: For those visiting Valley of Fire State Park, check out the Lost City Museum in nearby Overton. The museum is open Wednesday-Sundays and is one of my favorite small museums in the world.
Oh, heavy heart, heavy heart. A good time to remember gratitude. As I blew out the chalice to send him off to sleep, I told him I was thankful for the words “I love you”.
Some of you Bible-believing Christians reading this who are actually familiar with the book of Daniel might have already begun to see where this is going, but I will spell it out. We saw the range of different English expressions used in the different translations to describe what it was that Daniel proposed to not defile himself with: “delicacies,” “royal food,” “food…given to them by the king,” “king’s food,” “king’s choice food,” “king’s meat,” “king’s rich food,” king’s dainties” etc. The interlinear Hebrew-English Bible I used didn’t help me the way I was hoping it would (no real surprise, as I know that without a solid grasp of Hebrew grammar I’ll never be able to exegete at the level to which I personally aspire) – but in any case, verse 12 makes it very clear what Daniel and co DID choose to eat (which is more useful than knowing what they did not choose to eat) – vegetables and water.
I would not mind a job at a publishing house, or even as an editor in any company–in fact, I would really love a cubicle with a pile of paperwork to edit–as long as I was still able to write on my own time and publish a book.
The day Ella was born, our lives changed. I immediately fell head over heels in love with mothering. I had great support networks, a pretty easy baby, and a mothering tool bag that hasn't let me down yet. When Ella was a year old, we decided to try for another. However, Ella's love for breastfeeding has rendered my body infertile for the time being. I have been aching for another child so we deiced to explore adoption while we waited for my body to kick into gear. This is the Pro/Con list I made about the different options.
However, I’ve discovered a helpful item that’s quite inexpensive; and you most-likely have one right at hand…in your bathroom. Ready to face the battle? Grab your toothbrush!
-Writers Literary Publishing Services Company (the editing arm of the above-mentioned agencies)
Build Your Cayman Island Villa: House in a Box
Racial Silences in the Criminal Archive: Jail Censuses in Quito, 1750-1850
Delighted to see that the Spacehijackers, who painted their armoured car in Police colours to attend the G20 protests last year, are not going to face charges. The CPS appears to have used the common sense test… “
My friends, fellow marketing professionals and all you other cunts.
But you wrote me down and I thought I'd write you down as well, although I won't have readers for this one, well, you're my target audience anyway. So.
BE EMPATHETIC
After their highly recommended new record I had to get this one out !
At this things got heated, with everyone talking over everyone else, and Doug and I found it quite hilarious that Mark, a fatherly primary school teacher with young children of his own, was sitting there being such a curmudgeon, and in effect doing a pretty good impression of Nathan.
The book is laid out in lunch boxes. Hold on, let me explain that. The recipes are grouped together into what looks good in a box together. Like books arranged in meals I don't really get much use out of the format. I'm more likely to pick a few from each section and smush them together. Here it makes sense, allowing the packing of the lunchbox and the food combinations to be explained.
“Behind that stone façade that you see from University Avenue there is an entire line of galleries,” Panczenko said today. “There is one continuous line” and a “real relationship between what you see on the outside of the building and on the inside of the building.” The buildings “will continuously mesh together,” a docent said.
daughter took for a portrait challenge at the local camera club.
to a scent of life
Yes, and I did, and she published it, and it did well enough to keep going.
Me: It is a Goat......Ugh!
For today's first ever Queen For The Day challenge on SCS, I cased Mutnik's card here chick, chick! My rooster is a bit bigger, so I had to change a few things. I didn't use newspaper for the bg as I don't have any around, so I used a Rubbernecker French Script bg stamp, stamped with tea dye distres ink, distressed and smudged with more tea dye and vintage photo distress inks. I stamped the rooster with the vintage photo ink and clear embossed before coloring with Copic markers. The ruby red card front is stamped with the Rubbernecker chicken wire bg stamp and smudged with vintage photo distress ink. I added only one button because of space issues. The "thread" is actually a bit of regular twine which was taken apart to get a smaller bit. The card is Kraft.
By Erinn Proehl
Back to my original statement: I broke Jodi Picoult’s rule in these past twelve months, and, unless I get engaged in these final four hours before my birthday (anyone?…anyone?) , I broke my mother’s age-ist rule as well.
Our visits to Franschhoek in the beginning of our relationship always started, was frequently punctuated by and ended with either one or both of us exclaiming "I wish we could just spend the night here!" Last year, to celebrate our one year anniversary, we braved the valley's icy winter and spent a glorious June weekend tasting our way through the vineyards (you can read about our adventures here). This year, the Franschhoek craving hit early and I hastily began my search for "the perfect cottage". I can only describe what we found as the most perfect, most incredible, most romantic cottage I have ever stayed in. I have wrestled with the decision whether or not to reveal the name of this heaven, as it is already quite popular and the last thing I'd want is to book my next weekend and find that one of you has already booked it! In the interest of fairness, however, if you're simply dying to book it as well (which you darn well should be), then please drop me a mail and I'll send you all the details. There. No one can accuse me of being selfish now, can they?
“Nevertheless please be advised that we cannot in good conscience consider any borrowing requests for any purpose until we arrive at a satisfactory resolution to Legislative redistricting,” the letter stated. “Until there is fair, non-partisan redistricting there will be no bonding.”
Should the Akers team decide so to do, they could do a lot worse than reverse-wind to Andy Coulson’s testimony under oath at the trial of Tommy Sheridan, the Left-wing Scottish politician, during October last year. Having denied any acquaintance with – or even memory of – Stephen Whittamore during 2003-4, the obsessive detail-checking News of the World editor now calmly gave evidence helping to damn Sheridan to prison. One Court transcript excerpt I find especially intriguing runs as follows:
Opening tonight at the Flea Theatre is Black Moon Theatre Company’s production of Oscar Wilde’s 1891 play Salome. Playwright, poet, essayist, novelist, classical scholar, public performer, author of fairy tales and martyr Wilde is one of the most complete human beings who ever lived. I admire him so much my son’s middle name is Wilde. So I know this play well, have read it many times (in translation; Wilde wrote it in French), and saw the 1992 Circle in the Square production with Sheryl Lee in the title role and Al Pacino as Herod.
(posted by B__ on Memorial Day)
Received for Review:
Right, that's about it - if you want to join in with this massive global desk hop - you need to go to see the Chief - Julia of Stamping Ground here. She'll explain the ground rules (of which there are few)...
it was a brief talk, but i cried buckets.
Sayre fire in Sylmar, which started Friday night, swept through the Oakridge Mobile Home Park destroying at least 500 housing units. By Saturday night It had spread over at least 8,000 acres.
Orkney is a small group of islands off Scotland. Home of Thorfin Hausakluif (Skullsplitter), the 7th Viking Earl of Orkney 1,000 AD.
These are some of the things you'll find within The Danger Box, the new mystery from bestselling author Blue Balliett.
4. Place a sheet of baking paper in a medium-sized baking pan (around 30×24 cm / 12×9 inches) and spray it with non-stick spray. Spread ¾ of the brownie batter in the tray. Then spread the cream cheese mixture carefully onto the brownie batter using a rubber spatula, being careful not to mix the
Here I am, finally!
FURY is a must read if you love Greek mythology but be warned there isn't a lot thrown in, but its there and it had be running to my laptop to see what everything meant. Like I said before, its like a fresh pot of tea. I'm looking forward to see what ENVY and ETERNITY will have in store for me.
My wonderful, awesome, amazing midwife was there for the festivities. I was nervous about what the ultrasound might reveal. I told the tech (who did my ultrasounds with Lilah and Finn as well) in no uncertain terms that I was not interested in knowing about soft markers for anything. I truly don’t want information that’s only going to lead to speculation. All I wanted to know was: (a) does the baby appear to be viable, and (b) how far along am I?
The online market is huge and with the current Internet revolution, online shopping has just taken off. There are lots of web based business models coming up, which promise easy, reliable and customized shopping experience. Today, we have a look at Online Business card printing services
O, sweet Valar, why have I never tried this before?
Stopping, taking time, relooking at the rhythm of life is a spiritual act. Realigning your rhythm to God’s rhythm is a spiritual act, and also maybe a time for confession and forgiveness.
Betsy is creating havoc on the future and it is a future I am confused by and not sure it will be good.
Best-Case
And yesterday, God gave me a much-needed ‘moment’. I called a friend and prayed with her. And she kinda demurred at the prayer… This is a friend with whom I went to church, and we’ve been to a fairly charismatic (you know, pentecostal but not Pentecostal and a fairly traditional Anglican/Presbyterian church together. We’ve been in small group together. We’ve known each other for nearly seven years now. We’ve travelled together, visited each other’s homes. Um, you would assume that we’d be free to pray with each other. But I knew that she wouldn’t actually be so free to pray out loud, even with her family. She told me yesterday that I was important to her and the least she could do is take a day off and buy me lunch – in another city! I’d depend on her to listen in my horrible moments too. But all of this friendship-boasting to show that – no, it wasn’t the easiest thing to pray together.
Busty Girl Comics This one is exactly what it sounds like. Comics about the lives and everyday hardships of busty ladies.
I guess he didn't...dirt decidedly doesn't taste like M&Ms anymore... And we were all so close to Transformer cars!
Our natural resources are getting wasted everyday
Blindly moving into
If the fruit leather has begun to dry out, brush on a small amount of water so that they stick together. Add more ruffles until you achieve the desired puff shape. Set formed puff onto a piece of styrofoam. Use floral wires or tooth picks to prop up the fruit leather puff into it’s desired shape. Allow to dry out over night. Using the wires or toothpicks helps keep the puff from drooping or loosing it’s shape as it dries. You may need to allow puffs to dry out longer depending on the humidity.
Summer Rains
“Many of Vancouver’s small-apartment landlords are being shaken out of the money tree by a few big operators,” said one news story. New high-rises were “like magnets” pulling tenants from the smaller, older blocks that had been a gold mine for the small investor a few years earlier. Landlords had both to modernize and reduce rents to compete for tenants. The only advantage the older places had over the new high-rise apartments was their larger size.
The epicenter for the coming global financial collapse is almost certainly going to be in Europe. As you will see below, financial professionals all over the world are sounding the alarm about Europe. It is a disaster that everyone can see coming but that nobody seems to be able to prevent.
The Blues Brothers was released in 1980.
Texture in Hair - I am so happy that hair is more than just pin straight. I feel so glad to wake up every morning and not feel like I am fighting with my hair.
3) Nobody Knows You
But, the War on Terror was so obviously fake that it was just ridiculous to anybody who does any serious research or investigation.
Man: Hey, don’t move the light, huh!
Even if I didn't know Ian very well, that death devastated me, and I returned to the familiar: Steven.
Have you found this paradox to be true in your life? Have you given it all up for God and found so much more?
And now, onto some lighter fare:
In my continuing quest to determine each team's best card from every set that I have completed, I consider this the set that is the most challenging.
The faith behind these words becomes even more amazing, when considering where he wrote them. After learning of the loss of his daughters, Horatio boarded a ship out of New York, to join his wife in Europe. During the voyage, they passed over the very spot where his children were lost. It was at this moment that Horatio poured his grief-stricken heart into this beautiful hymn.
It stands to reason I suppose, that something as absurd as trying to cure erectile dysfunction by hanging a weight off of your penis with a sash and then swinging it back and forth would disappear from the internet, or never be mentioned on it at all.
Prayer
For example, polydimethylsloxane is a silicone which is often used in shampoos & conditioners as it makes hair shiny and slippery. It is also used in some moisturisers for it's 'skin protection' properties. Magnesium stearate is a derivitave from both animal and vegetable oils, and bismuth oxychloride gives cosmetics a pearly effect. I don't want to bore you with an elaborate list of the uses of these ingredients, but I will note some of the interesting findings I came across :)
UMNO’s deportment on this matter is again hypocrisy. It’s all about getting votes in elections and to remain in power. The Opposition is not a threat to the MRI. It’s UMNO that fear losing power with the emergence of a strong Opposition. UMNO is now in a political doldrums.
Who is to blame?
We will all be fined."
Reading Seducing the Governess after Brazen gave an insight on how the characters were developed and how the story would go along. Maguire does a good job at giving the reader ample time to cheer on Mercy and Nash as they know they can’t be together but are nevertheless drawn to each other.
Sometimes wrestling fails to capture your imagination. I would hazard a guess that 95% of the people reading this review will be thinking of me in a derisory manner for enjoying wrestling, but this match was brilliant. Everyone knows that Lesnar- as a former UFC World
For my stop, Tracey Garvis Graves will be sharing her most memorable character quotes from the book: “Dude, your babysitter is smokin’ hot.” (Ben)
‘We’ll be heading off down the hospital pretty soon,’ he says, taking the stethoscope from his ears and looping it innocently round his neck. I hand him an oxygen mask. Cheryl accepts it passively.
We know that the law is spiritual; but I am unspiritual, sold as a slave to sin. I do not understand what I do. For what I want to do I do not do, but what I hate I do. And if I do what I do not want to do, I agree that the law is good. -Romans 7:14-16 (emphasis mine)
The 14-month-old mutt, named Moses Chan, was playing with the four cats in the garden while his owner went to the shops.
Lying in ruin
He has written for a wide variety of magazines, including Cosmopolitan, Reader’s Digest, and the Boston Globe Sunday Magazine, and has been a Sunday columnist for Gannett’s Burlington Free Press since 1992. Chris graduated from Amherst College, and lives in Vermont with his wife and daughter.
Thank you Becca for sharing this project with us today!
Color: 9/10- the color is soooo pretty! I took a point off though because they were a little more purple than i was expecting. A lot of people noticed my purple eyes right away. I'd definitely buy these in another color though, like green or blue. The purple is still really nice though! It's very fun. :D
Red: R27
I’ll give you the rest of the story as Steve told it in a recent edition of Christianity magazine: ‘We stood in silence for a moment. I watched as Nathan’s body language slowly changed. His story had been subverted. His full stop had become a comma. There was another clause to the sentence; another paragraph to the chapter; another chapter to the book – and it was called hope.’
Anyway, Mr. Fantastic was brought to the movie screens only in 2005 in “Fantastic Four” played by Ioan Gruffudd. Maybe because the technology to show Mr. Fantastic’s power to extend various parts of his body (hmmm…?) were not available yet, the Hollywood version was a bit late.
Oct 08 2008 Los Angeles, CA @ The Roxy Theatre
Cold Weather (Katz)
The start of Bible Study Fellowship and the opportunity to teach Isaiah! Yikes! Gift? I guess.
This torturous date isn't over, though, and it continues back at Sylvia's place, where the halting conversation continues and Sylvia gets drunk on sherry, working up her courage to seduce the seemingly asexual Peter. His prim manners are memorably skewered in a subtly funny shot of him sitting down with a full cup of coffee, carefully balancing the liquid, pausing for a moment to let it steady, and then slowly crossing his legs. In contrast, Sylvia, though she's also shy and quiet, is much less repressed; she can be playful, and there's a hint of mischief in her frequent smiles. She's also lovely, and Leigh makes this a very sensual scene for Sylvia, her pale face floating in the darkness, her bare legs pulled up under her as she lounges on the couch, her posture an invitation for Peter to come sit next to her. Peter is oblivious, though, blathering on about Marshall McLuhan and language and design. Finally, in an extraordinary moment, Sylvia, flushed with sherry, tentatively tries to shame him into intimacy: "if we were able to... touch each other... it wouldn't be so bad."
Even if someone was supportive of apartheid and racist (which DAP did not address in any clarity with intent to end so far), a political party cannot invade their property and destroy their livelihood.
I’ve worked out that the cost for me to attend, travelling from Tshwane, is R4600.00. That’s roughly $US 615.00, or 385 British pounds; about my average monthly pension. It’s calculated on the basis of my travelling alone by car. If I went by plane I’d have to add the plane fare to that figure, and the cost of getting to the airport at this end (about R240 on the Gautrain). The cost of petrol to travel all the way from Pretoria is about the same as the cost of the transfer from King Shaka Airport to the Conference venue and back again. So if I can find one or two people to come with me in the car, sharing the petrol cost, it will come out a bit cheaper. Leave a comment below if you’re planning to travel to the conference from Tshwane and might be interested in joining me on the journey, but be warned, I don’t do toll roads, so there might be quite a bit of pothole dodging.
The image above would have been one example of that except the original image had the background as black around the spires area (thank goodness! that would have been a difficult one to work on eitherwise.)
Amazing though it is, Catherine's was not the only magical personal story last night. I was blown away to hear that the winner of the short story category was Helen Hardy, longstanding and valued member of the East Dulwich Writer's Group. (Before anyone suggests corruption, let me hasten to add that I judged the full length novel category, so had no hand in Helen's well-deserved success.)
Pour in the vodkas and the creme de cocoa - using a long spoon, stir well.
Do you have a holy place, and if so where is it?
2 pebble
Short term support is now at the two OEW pivots 1386 then 1372. Short term resistance is at SPX 1393, then around 1398-1402. Short term momentum displays a slight negative divergence. Best to your trading!
Batman Returns
From next month my sales, competitions and giveaways will all be bimonthly. The first bimonthly giveaway and competition will be posted at the start of June, and the sale will be late July.
But where? Where is our clear answer? I don't live in a world that has any of those. Not really, anyway. We like to assume the stance of certainty and conviction, but not one answer seems to stand firm against the onslaught of every possible experience, every possible shred of information, and every possible circumstance. And as much as I don't like to leave a bit of writing dangling with this feeling of conflicted joy-sad-ambiguity, it's what I have. There is no punchline.
I have written to the address (to whom it may concern) asking if they know of any family members of the original family at that address in relation to my mother... I am waiting for a reply.
"Oh, would you fly it down by the ground?"
5/13 – Maple Coins & 9th Anniversary Android Box (to get an android).
Adding fuel to the fire is the Australian Ballet’s look and feel. I just love the way the style and present their campaigns. This photo is so cute.
I'm fine
This actually applies to all plastic furniture that we use on the terrace or in the garden. The answer return their whiteness or purity is … a toothpaste. Squeeze a whitening toothpaste on the brush and rub vigorously. Then polish with a soft cloth.
Punchline puts all that complexity and style within reach, with just a click or two away to become part of your finished piece.
The world has long refused to take notice of Palestinian one-sided efforts over the years to reach a peaceful outcome of their conflict with Israel. It is helpful to recall that in 1988 the PLO officially accepted Israel within its 1967 borders, a huge territorial concession, leaving the Palestinians with only 22% of historical Palestine on which to establish an independent and sovereign state. In recent years, the main tactics of Palestinian opposition to the occupation, including on the part of Hamas, has been largely to turn away from violence, adhering to a diplomacy and practice that looked toward long-term peaceful coexistence between two peoples. Israel has not taken note of either development, and has instead continuous thrown sand in Palestinian eyes. The official Israeli response to Palestinian moves toward political restraint and away from violence have been to embark upon a program of feverish settlement expansion, extensive targeted killing, reliance on excessive retaliatory violence, as well as an intensifying oppressiveness that gave rise to these hunger strikes. One expression of this oppressiveness is the 50% increase in the number of Palestinians held under administrative detention during the last year, along with an officially mandated worsening of conditions throughout its prison system.
(b) Work up a lather and scrub for 30 minutes, paying particular attention to the between-the-fingers and the fingerprints, where the sneakiest germs try to hide.
10) There was maybe half-an-inch of water in the bottom of the closet at this point and it was starting to creep out under the door. Water was spouting out, hitting the ceiling then raining back down onto me, onto the coats, into my shoes, and into the pocket of my apron. (Yeah, I had an apron. What of it? It was fantastic for storing things.) The faucet handle was gone- I couldn’t see where it fell in the downpour with mascara in my eyes- so I kneeled down and crawled around on my hands and knees feeling for it with my hands. My pants were soaking, my shirt was soaking, and my apron dragged through what was quickly becoming a full inch of water.
*Local times for CIDER sessions are provided on our website:
Kaylee just wants to enjoy having caught the attention of the hottest guy in school. But a normal date is hard to come by when Nash seems to know more about her need to scream than she does. And when classmates start dropping dead for no apparent reason, only Kaylee knows
A broken wrist will do that to ya.
Today I followed a yoga DVD on accepting love which entails mostly the breath of fire in various positions. I even managed to cook a lovely meal which is yet another step back to normality since my appetite had vanished a few weeks ago, or was it months?
Here we are again true believers, with my latest weekly 10 best feature for the fine folks over at Anomalous Material. For those of you not in the know, those same said fine folks have given me a (possibly foolish on their behalf) regular gig as feature writer. It is a series of top ten lists on various cinematic subjects - and anyone who knows me can attest to how perfectly suited I am to such an endeavor (yes I am a list nerd). This week's feature, my twenty-fifth such feature, is on those films set in the great and classic land of India. But instead of discussing films actually made in India (great ones like Pyaasa, The Cloud-Capped Star and Pather Panchali) we are going with those films set in India but made my outsiders. British and American films set in the great ancient land. Here we go.....
–Wired Science
Throughout the summer and into the fall we continued to clear paths and revive the garden. On October 30th we came to work and from every north window of the house and every vantage point of the back yard one maple dominated the scene.
However, there are two sides to nonduality. One side consists of the shedding of excessive action — drinking, drugs, too much partying, all our addictions and self-indulgent habits — and the shifting of attention from outward distractions to a realization of one’s nature as I Am. It is this side of nonduality that would be most useful to most people.
What vocabulary words would you like to add?
Because this is what it is all about… first impressions. And we all know the saying; you don’t have a second chance at a first impression.
Surprisingly, thanks to a breakthrough in the decoding of the Mayan calendar, it is almost unique in doing so in any detail. Indeed, it concludes by wondering how the various prophets either of doom or of positive transformation will react when they discover that both they and their familiar world are still here in 2013, when they and their publishers will inevitably be starting to look rather foolish.
On a lighter note, my LAST SEMESTER of classes at Appalachian begin on Tuesday and seriously.. I have been counting down the days. I have always loved school and usually enjoy the school year more than I do the summer! I am really excited to meet all of my new education professors and begin my internship at my placement school! I wonder what grade I will be in? Unfortunately, I do not think I will get to be in 3rd grade again (which is my favorite).. but I am being hopeful that I will equally enjoy whatever I am assigned to! I just got really lucky and fell in love with 3rd grade!
You're probably asking yourself, just how does one attain such perfect ringlets?
Wait, there's another one:
I feel a keen kinship with this operation, as much of my free time and behind-the-scenes work is devoted to the search and rescue of films that don't have the protection of a big Hollywood studio. Not quite the "orphans" the NFPF champions...more kind of like the "unloved children" of neglectful parents. For over half a decade, I have freelanced for multiple independent DVD labels in the preparation of dozens of exploitation and genre films for the home video market. From courting copyright holders, locating source prints, coaxing reluctant filmmakers and talent to speak on the record, getting word-of-mouth around on the release, and finally, trying to get the damned things seen by an unfamiliar public, I've done all of these tasks and more. Moreover, I've done this for little-to-no pay, great private expense, and amazingly enough, enormous abuse from the people who purport to be the fans of these films.
Ken thought he took just picture of scandal. But it has big secreat scene. That is…muder scene.
There is a good amount of subtle humour contained in the pages; this is certainly not a book that takes itself too seriously. It is jam packed with Deus Ex Machina leaving you confidence Bluebear will always escape from a fix no matter how unlikely.
Have you imagined different emergency scenarios and made a list of necessary items and steps to take quick and effective action?
12- Prepare the appropriate pan for the cabbage by placing the rest of onion slices, and a layer of two leaves or veins, place the stuffed cabbage leaves and put the pan well covered on high heat with 2 cups of chicken broth till boil then lower the heat to low and allow it to cook for abuot 15 minutes, after "Mahshy" is cookedserve it with your preferred meat or chicken and... Bon Apetit :)
Of course my marriage doesn't work that way and I don't want my relationship with my kids to work that way either. We respect that we each need time to do the things we need/want to do. Somedays I am on the computer all day paying bills, chatting with family and friends on Facebook, blogging, learning about new people and their life experiences, etc. I love to do this. Other days, I feel like I can't look at the computer another second and I get out of the house or get motivated to clean it. My kids do the same thing. Both of them love all that electronics provide for them, but like most people, they have other interests besides electronics. Maybe that is because they have never had to worry about their electronic time being limited .
3 rested
“How is that so?” Clay said (See what I mean.)
Art that builds strongly on past foundation often becomes blurred together in the minds of the audience; in this way often Heavy Metal bands are no longer interpreted as if they're making confident strides forward with their musical offerings to the form, instead their - often decades long - contributions are slight and non-cumulative. This band introduced more orchestral elements, perhaps that one plays faster than most. This one has some kickass graphic design to go with their extreme metal. These aren't innovations, they're safe variations. There is no 'one album' that cuts through the mists as a definitive statement. Ergo, listeners do not come to these bands to be immersed in a singular world, to feel as if the only thing that exists at that moment is themselves and the Entity summoned by this mythical piece of art. They listen to this music instead on shuffle, a record's as good as any other, all from a distance. They can appreciate what the band may be bringing to the table on some intellectual level, but they're not enchanted by the music to the degree that they suspend the language through which they categorize and codify their experience. This art is just not startling enough to achieve that. It is in this way that say, a black metal band in 2011 becomes just a black metal band in 2011. The riffs might be nice, the songs might flow well, the black mountains and treetop frost cover is pleasant to look at but... all these aesthetic signifiers are gazed upon from a distance. With distance comes irony. The feeling of being outside and afar from what one feels is a defining aspect of modern life. Art, romantic art in particular, was intended as a remedy of exactly that. If it fails at eradicating the distance between host and emotion, it has failed completely as romance. What is left is mostly a comfortable, safe product.
They begin with visits from an author, an illustrator, and an author/illustrator who talk about the creative spark (basically where they get their ideas from) and show and tell a little bit about how they work.
You have been warned…
Bachmann's congressional spokes-tool, Becky Rogness, said Bachmann now enjoys dual citizenship with the US and Switzerland: "Congresswoman Bachmann's husband is of Swiss descent so she has been eligible for dual-citizenship since they got married in 1978. However, recently some of their children wanted to exercise their eligibility for dual-citizenship so they went through the process as a
Me: I threw one away.
Donna Green (Lab) 1,099
The hangman drawing along with the dimensions.
Call Pixie Vacations at: 678-815-1584
SH: No. My head hurts. My sinuses are stuffed up. I'm all congested.
For paint I just use kids paints; any kind. I used the ones that have a clear cover and have 36 little circles of watercolor, like this one. Any brand. I never use the white. I think these were $4-$5, but I used another week's Hobby Lobby coupon and got half off. Quite often they have a percentage off if you go to Hobby Lobby online.
- You can have fun just hanging out.
Todays Question: "Who decided that chocolate should go on sale?"
The article’s title is too clever and loaded for me to put prominently here without setting off more alarms that could offend some people’s sensibilities, but I didn’t write it. One excerpt gives a hint of the article’s core topic, “Colorblindness doesn’t work because we never stop spotting differences in our environment.” A second excerpt seems to capture a valuable lesson from the discussion, “The good news is that our brains get used to difference; in most situations, exposure to people of different races reduces prejudice. “ My own takeaway and personal thoughts…we all have subconscious and involuntary associations with people of all types, but biases and preconceptions don’t necessarily make us racist. The article is really worth a full read in my opinion, so please don’t accuse me of paraphrasing or taking liberties with the article’s content.
I hope you ladies have a wonderful holiday season and handle it with more grace and dignity that I will.
Stay tuned…
Yet this bond has started to weaken and it is going to proceed in that direction, I guess.
UPDATE: 3rd March 2012. The property has now reportedly been sold for €1.9m equivalent to €115 psf. According to David Raleigh at the Irish Times, the identity of the buyer has not been disclosed.
Preheat oven to 400 and bake wings for about 25-30 minutes, or until skin starts to brown and crisp a bit. Pour off any liquid, turn over, and bake for another 10-15 minutes. Remove from oven and roll in buffalo sauce. Return to baking sheet and bake for another 10 or so minutes. Serve with extra sauce, blue cheese, and celery.
He bumped a hip against her chair. “Poker, of course.”
They have shops that serve soup in bread bowl, crepe, gelato, coffee, thai. They have food you can casually eat at the chairs and tables they have provided in the hallway, or there are couple formal sit down places as well. Occasionally you will find pop-up sample sales too.
Today's recipe is so quick and easy-to-make but tastes SO GOOD. Isn't it interesting that the simpliest of ingredients can make the best tasting food? Ham and potato soup is really inexpensive to make. I used leftover ham and the rest of the ingredients I either had on-hand or were very inexpensive to buy. Simple, wholesome, inexpensive, and great-tasting. That's my kind of cooking!
That's why the harp is lying on the ground
“So, you’re saying you wouldn’t do it?”
If you are interested in any of these or would like more information, I encourage you to call their office at 256-765-4862.
quote of the day - how wonderful it is that nobody need wait a single moment before starting to improve the world. (anne frank)
We have been a homeschooling family for about 5 years now and I can not begin to explain how wonderful this is for our family. I am so happy I never said oh I can't do that, I did say I have no idea how we are going to do this. There is a big difference there and it can be applied to anything in life. I don't think that the our family does things the "right" way, I think it works for us and when part of it stops working we change that part. We look for as many possibilities as we can find and start trying until we find something that works. That is my wish for other families instead of responding with an I could never how about a "Wow, I never thought to try that"!
”We need an anomaly,” she said. ”That´ll be our sign.” Sometimes R thought her just as insane as The Cardinal, she too was working after some master plan visible only to herself.
Réal Laplaine
His aunt, Lulu Mngoma says: "The police are supposed to protect, uphold the rule of law, instead of making a travesty of our criminal justice system. We are going to do everything in our power to ensure justice is served, that these police are brought to book."
It was tasty but the leek scapes were way too tough. I think if I try this dish again I'll have to steam the scapes first and then saute them. Plus, I think there were a few too many in relation to the rice, but I didn't want any to go to waste. But you can't really go wrong with bacon, bacon fat, rice and cheese! A very tasty dinner indeed.
The chicken ended up really tender and juicy, and the thighs (there’s one on that plate) just fell off the bone. The squash and pears ended up a little mushy, and most things that get crocked for 8 hours do, but all in all, it was a delicious dish, with both sweet and sour notes. I definitely look forward to getting another delicata, and soon!
08-Eustin Gregory-You Are So Real
Couldn’t they give Producer a name? I mean come on, everyone else had a name, even the bastard at the other company. Guess it was like being DOC in Red vs. Blue. It just sticks. Dufrane. I know though, he was the eyes in the games, so it makes sense. Still.
Thank you for offering your views on the matter. I needed that.
ma, is Odinga's follower. You interrupted your New Hampshire campaigning to
I have three prizes to give away and lets start with third runner up..... (I have drawn the winners at random!) Third runner up wins one Mini-Magnolia image - which one will be a surprise!
Urges the committee to look at the AG's report--clear that players were innocent, no credible evidence, AG found evidence DPD never uncovered.
*Do not offer the officials anything (including free lemonade) to overlook the violation.
I won't go into all the details at this time, but just let me say that I hope I don't ever have to go through another week like this last one! EVER!
The most obvious is on racial policy. The NP thought it could run a successful economy without fully exploiting the skills of the black population. The ANC thinks it can run a successful state without fully exploiting the skills of the white population. The evidence that this cannot be done is apparent all the time at all levels and in all branches of government. And it is beginning to cause instability at local level and hurt the party.
To the heavens around us
The really fucking sick part is now I’m questioning whether or not he really loves me, or if those have just been more empty words.
Anyway, I feel pretty good about things so far. I also took probably my most difficult final today and so it is a relief to be done. AND just to keep this a photo relate blog, here is the thesis project that is currently on display in the Jean-Marie Gallery in Harrigan Hall. Special thanks to all the couples who helped me out and were willing to model.
Perfectly normal manner that are marred when you face years of therapy
CHILI # 3 - FRED'S FAMOUS BURN DOWN THE BARN CHILI
“Gosh, Mr Bananas, you were so fantastic!” she gushed. “I almost wet my knickers laughing when you sat on that clown!”
Shards are everywhere. And I get cut. And I’m bleeding.
It was a good little something-to-keep-her-busy
I mean you barely see the wallpaper….and the sink….and the faux brass towel rings. This is not an accurate representation.
She’s cute. Her way of talking is cute and she sulks but I think she’s cute even when she sulks.
With all His creations intricate details and glorious splendour.
Vacant homes: Septic inspections can still be performed on vacant homes. Sometimes a hydraulic load test will be done by running approximately 150-200 gallons of water into the system. Septic dye may also be used to determine flow.
have you ever made a card that turned out COMPLETELY different than you pictured it in your head? well, this one was like that for me: i'd envisaged it being sort of edgy & funky & super-distressed...but apparently it was determined to be shabby chic. finally i had to respect its wishes and go with the flow!
1 altogether
There are many things us Brits are good at, and there are quite a few of those things that we even mange to make look cool and sexy, like Italy based gold bullion heists and Mini Coppers, for example. One thing us Brits aren’t good at, and we definitely don’t’ make either sexy or cool, is caravanning. For one thing, British caravans are rather like badly decorated sardine tins, sardine tins who’s interior design sensibilities invariably ground somewhere around 1987, this is immediately a problem. Also, we don’t have the weather for it, when caravanning in the UK the average person is wearing three pairs of socks, stout Wellington boots and as many jumpers as they can fit under their cagoule. Non of these factors make for sexy or, indeed, cool.
I think if I could afford to have someone else clean our floors every week I would do it! We have hardwood floors through out our entire house but one room. Yes they may seem easier to clean up spills and such, but man I think the day after I sweep the dust and hair balls are already forming!
But I Do love that this item is Machine Washable along with the other items I reviewed!
"I was going up to Manchester a lot, going to raves and clubs with Graham Massey and the rest of 808. That sort of scene seems to last a couple of years – you're in a small room and everyone's on their toes, anticipating what song's going to be put on next. And I was spoilt because 808 State knew all the places to go. I don't remember specific clubs – when you're with a gang of people, they just take you around. Plus, maybe I wasn't particularly sober!"
Even beating Richard Mannington Bowes, 68, to death only attracted an eight year sentence, and we know that Darrell Desuze will probably serve half of that. This despite the fact that he also pleaded guilty to violent disorder and burglary.
In the case of Measure E, the mythology is not clear and the story is kind of all over the place. I am not sure specifically what the ‘good’ schools are and how the district is overall due to the fact(s) which indicate there have been massive shifts in population and teachers within just the last six years while I have been here. I am not quite sure the money is really the answer to solve the woes of AUSD as it seems there are many other factors at work/play here.
This is hands down the best book of the Discworld series. It’s stand alone and I highly recommend it to anyone who has any interest in Terry Pratchett, fairy tales, young adult fiction, or hilariousness. It’s like a cross between the pied piper, the rats of NIMH and Terry Pratchett’s general awesomeness. This may be my favorite book I’ve read all year.
NO TIME NO SPACE
Also, I’d like to note that while the White Castle sliders and cheeseburgers were not meant to be a part of the competition, they did top all of our lists, hands down. “Eating White Castle is like eating a tumor,” said Shannon. “But it’s delicious.”
Its resolution could send a signal that owners of some 1 million hectares of the nation’s prime agricultural land who have evaded coverage would also be subjected to agrarian reform with three years left before the program’s mandated completion under a 2009 law.
Dylan 02:13 minutes Yvonne 02:17 minutes
Designer paper is from My Minds Eye. I used the big layers Mat stack 3 die from Papertrey, Ink as a anchor for the main image. The dies I used on the sentiment come from Verve and work so well with so many sentiments.
Most of the characters lack really memorable or unique personality traits, but that’s not really the point of this manga. Aren is an interesting case. While he may lack really quirky personality traits, the author compensates for this with the humanity that Aren has in the face of his problems. Aren really wants to do the right thing, and strives to be “good”, in a society that would rather hide and look out for its own self-interest at the expense of a sacrificed few. Looking at Aren makes me wonder how many people would be willing to take his role in OUR society, as it grows more and more individually-centered. Mikasa is a really strong female character, whose growth was a direct result of various childhood problems; I love how she took tragedy and made herself stronger as a result. Armin is also a bit of an interesting case, as I see myself in Armin the most. I don’t really have that much physical stamina, and I would hate to be a burden as well. As a result, whenever I see Armin trying his best, I really cheer for him.
Oh oh oh…mm, mmm, oh yeah yeah!”
The "wasteful virtues," I'm afraid,
Bresse-Bleu
This game show sketch had every right to fall flat on its face. The whole thing is dependent on two quirky, odd-voiced “Barker’s Beauties” girls for laughs. Fortunately, those girls are Kristen Wiig and Maya Rudolph, who show the contestant (Vanessa Bayer) what her prizes would have been if she won the showcase. Wiig and Rudolph have a ton of fun with it, changing their accents, trying to glamorize terrible prizes, and crashing golf carts into scenery. Wiig breaks. Hader, as the host, breaks. The best to describe this sketch is that, if you saw it at home, you SO wish you could have been there to see it in person.
Here is an interesting blog entry by Alex Hutchison where he looks at a new study from a lab at the University of Colorado on shoes and barefoot running economy.
Also in our refrigerator was a zip-top baggie of fresh lo mein noodles. No, we didn’t make these. We got them from a pretty damn awesome Asian Grocery called Fook’s Foods. Why does this place rock our socks off? Well, for starters, they sell delicious one-pound blocks of nice, firm bulk tofu for 89¢. Plus spicy, tangy kimchi by the pound. And really good ramen noodles (not an oxymoron). And sometimes, freshly caught shrimp or crabs from the Georgia coast. And, as evidenced by our supper tonight, deliciously fresh lo mein noodles that cook up in about 5 minutes.
Row 15- (sc in 1, 2sc in next) (42)
AFRICA
I’ve crossed over to the dark side. I’ve become one of those former smokers who can’t stand to be around cigarettes.
There are many versions of vegetarian Char Siew. Here is my simplified Chinese Vegan Char Siew Recipe.
lower my expectations...
Everything about flying makes me crack up. We get to our gate at the airport in Boise and the guy announcing the boarding was totally on a power trip.
James was commissioned to paint a portrait of our cottage for my sixtieth birthday. He is a keen hang-glider and the subjects of many of his paintings are seen from a bird's-eye view. Because of this we erected a scaffolding tower at the edge of the lawn. He sat on a chair atop this in nonchalant fashion, sketching and making notes. He went away with this information and several weeks later phoned to ask, "Do you want me to include the house next door?"
Bachelor party llama
I'm so busy! We are building a new house and selling the one we are living in. Both transactions are going to be completed this month. I have had so much paperwork and meetings and inspections that I seem to meet myself coming in and going out the door.
Monday - Staff meeting. The chicks are not hatching! Why?
Used Cherry Lynne die too - my favourite - totally loving it - can you tell?
Vinay: My friends! The friends I have made at KIS are the most amazing people….who have motivated, encouraged and supported me here. Mrs Fernandes, in the College office has also been a great source of support. And Ms Shanti, the IB Coordinator was a good person to keep me on track. She is always honest and always advised me with the best intentions.
EE: I read the book after I had already seen Blade Runner, and I was struck by how different it was—and to my mind, better. The thing that intrigued me about it was Mercerism, empathy, and their relationship to the symbol of the electric sheep—none of which appeared in the movie at all. The movie is of course an entity in itself, and groundbreaking in its own way, but it didn’t capture the heart of what the book said to me.
Stanley Tucci, The Lovely Bones
“Righteous are you, O Lord,
a call to me to come back to the source.
He hasn't slept since Sunday night. It's Thursday. I'm exhausted and I feel so helpless. My poor little guy is in extreme pain. Tomorrow we are headed to the Pediatrician, where medication will be prescribed and my prayers of some relief for Connor will hopefully be answered.
Once cool enough to handle, peel off the skins and dump potato into a bowl. Add butter, milk, salt and pepper, then mash using either a handheld electric mixer or an immersion blender. Add more milk as needed.
And, companies that are smart see that, they don’t want to play that game, and they decide at that point that it’s time to clean up.”
May Momtra: The only sure-fire path to success is being exactly who I am, grit, glory and all. Repeat 3x.
Brad and I thoroughly enjoy watching the kids reactions to this game. Its hilarious!
Chronic enterovirus infection has been found in the stomach and terminal ileum of patients with myalgic encephalomyelitis/chronic fatigue syndrome.
Yeah, it was over.
In response to a note sent to the Centre inviting our participation, I wrote to the Islamic Supreme Council rejecting in absolute terms any involvement in this program. While this is a serious course of action to take, a series of deeply troubling concerns regarding the record of Imam Soharwardy and the Islamic Supreme Council leave us with no other option."
That being said, she never gave anything up for free, you had to earn it. Dancing in half time shows at the football games and pep rally's had to be earned. Honestly, I always thought I'd be the only senior girl to graduate and never get to dance at a pep rally. But I had to work for that if I wanted it.
Lets see what I want this year.
- I accidentally put UFO marks on the grass. Yep. Well heres what happened : I had the kids raking up those big long pine needles out of the yard like a drill Sergeant. There were so many big heaping piles I didn't know what to do. Finally I said with a gleam in my eye "burn em!" Well again, my dear husband got home and informed me that I had destroyed the grass layer under the burned places. Here I was sooo excited to have a REAL LAWN and now I've up and put UFO marks in it. Its like I possess this path of destruction to nice and normal everywhere I go..... Now thats all off my chest and hopefully somebody can laugh with me ;-)
E'en as the sweetest note is born of pain,
The book is divided into six chapters. The first chapter is a biography of Christian Louboutin from his start as a designer to his work for Chanel and Yves Saint Laurent to his first boutique in 1992. Chapter two features the Louboutin boutiques around the world showing all the wonderful displays. Chapter three is all about celebrating his 20 years of design with AMAZING photography of all the shoes and special highlights over the years. Chapter four is all about the interiors of Louboutin’s homes in Paris, Luxor and Egypt and how these inspire him, also behind the scenes shots from his studios and workshops! Chapter five is all about his collaboration with David Lynch, a series of photo’s called Fetish, limited-edition shoes by Louboutin and finally chapter six is a complete catalogue of his work over the past 20 years with photos of 120 shoes.
Katniss and Peeta are stopped, both being crowned victors in the 74th Hunger Games.
She's a remarkable gal and you're gonna love her!
Science doesn't just accept something as a fact because someone with a big name, a chest full of medals, or a fancy title says so. Even after a hundred years, scientists are still questioning and testing Einstein's ideas about gravity and the speed of light.
but I am reticent
It's funny to me that a man who thinks I'm ridiculous for getting caught up in the blogging world (more specifically, for being so excited for the Tampa Blogger Meetup), is the one who is going to critique the blog and get all bent out of shape about it. It's kinda cute! I guess I'm pretty lucky that the Hubs actually reads this little ol' thing.
521- I enjoyed watching some good tv shows with Marc
I don't drink coffee now... not because I don't want to... I do, I really, really do... but because it doesn't agree with me. I know that maybe one little cup every now and then wouldn't hurt... but truthfully, I don't want just one little cup... I want the whole long, aromatic and delicious experience... So now I drink tea... green tea in the morning and herbals in the afternoon. My body thanks me but my psyche doesn't.... Not a day passes that I don't miss my espresso... There is something so incredibly right about a morning coffee, an espresso after lunch... and a chat with the girls is so much better over a coffee... Why is that?
As anyone who has lived through something awful may know, sometimes a tragedy can end in victory.
I feel superior, yes I do!
As part of the ongoing series of posts about beautiful gardens, I thought I'd show you one of my favourite Australian gardens, Musk Farm, an enchantingly sweet country garden near the village of Daylesford, in western Victoria.
Musée d'Art Contemporain de Montréal…
PS – The ice bath afterwards was SO COLD!!! I let my body cool down too much first, doing chores and such, so I was shivering in the bath. Now THOSE were fervent prayers!!! Now I may start to taper off for Bloomsday on Sunday…..
$100,000 ($500,000 in the case of a corporation), or imprisoned not
The owner believes Poldi ran away because he did not get on with her other cat, according to Ms Kosenbach.
Stick to comedy, Conan.**
~1.5 Tb Cooking Oil (I prefer Olive)
And if you weren’t near Toronto last weekend, there are still a limited amount of redemption packs available at iCollectPanini.com. If you missed out, make sure to keep checking back for new promotions.
Anyway, the man’s target didn’t respond and he went on to the next person: “DO YOU ENGAGE!?”
Here are the colors I used
In the summer of 2009, I ran into Leo again while walking through town. Surprisingly, he instantly remembered me. I told him that I had published the story of Mildred Packer on my blog, which at that time did not have a huge number of readers, and had none in the northern New Mexico area as far as I was aware.
Full version of this cake. I do love a good cake, and even though it was not within my calorie plan for the day I had a piece of the big cake and a cupcake. I would never want this type of glory to go to waste.
The Signature Chefs Auction, held just a couple weeks ago, is one of the biggest fundraisers for the March of Dimes. The event entails a lot of great food from area restaurant chefs, a silent auction, and some incredible live auction packages. The end result is tons of money be raised for a worthy cause – that of improving the health of babies born premature or with birth defects through research, education and advocacy.
Also, as I often rant to workshop groups, I would steer away from the use of “like,” finding it too passive, and even unbearable (I find removing “ing” has the same effect, for the same reason); why say a thing is “like” when you can be more direct, say simply a thing?
Preheat oven to 350F. In a large bowl, mix the flour, sugar, spices, baking soda, baking powder and salt.
03. Burn Home Burn
1 can black beans, drained and rinsed
Turn 2: The Bear goes Bone-Head again! Sheesh! What about the Boar? He rolls a 1 too! Stupid Pig.
The Republican candidates to succeed Mr. Obama are beginning to find their voices on the national security portfolio. They will be formally debating the president's sorry record in coming weeks. The question the American people will want answered is not only "Who lost the world?" but what they will do to get it back.
Visit Alex’s site and leave a comment during his book tour for a chance to win CassaFire, CassaStar, and a CassaFire tote bag and mug!
despite the fact that it was december,
Campbell told the school board she “anticipated full passage by the members.” There are about 220 teachers, three nurses and several teaching assistants in the union.
I really think adding the white purse and shoes makes the outfit a little more crisp and clean. Even though wearing white at a wedding is a no-go, shoes and purses should work fine, right? Right?
The risk of attempting vbac is often mis-understood and overstated, leading to risk management protocols in hospital that are likely to lead to repeat caesarean surgery. Click here for more detail on risk.
Chivo Enchilado, stewed baby goat on a fresh tortilla. The Bite Club folks picked out a live animal at a local purveyor and had it slaughtered for the occasion. Heavily seasoned, with a ton of different chiles in it. The soup accompaniment which was a broth made from the offal of the baby goat was fantastic and soothing. Nothing wasted.
I should also mention that WILD WEATHER! refers to one of the best television shows on at the moment, 'The Hamster Wheel', a program poking fun at Australian news and politics.
a lonely, Mono Log.
We live in different states and I couldn’t get a flight out the same day, so while I was waiting I had to burn off some energy. I figured I could make something practical, like a journal to take notes in when I do meet w/ her doctors.
My morning began with watching the Qualifying session (which was taped from 4.30am) of the Australian Grand Prix. And then it was getting stuck into the laundry (mountains of it I kid you not!) And then a full on blitz of the house… thankfully help was on hand in the form of hubby and son…. PHEW!! So aches & pains in full swing afterwards, this card was my sit down reward time.. :0) And oh boy colouring in this Delightful D’Arcy truly did make it all so very worth while! SMILES.
I really like Mexican food. And one of the things I really enjoy about it is how heavily customisable it is. You can pretty much throw anything in and it’ll still taste great.
Is so hard for you to say
'Wish I was there' . . .
Getting the rest of the world to accept that the work done as an unschooler is just as valuable if not more so than those raised in a brick and mortar system.
Season with salt and pepper. Spread sweet potatoes on baking sheet and do not over-
Only one thing ever spooked him,
There is such a variety of mediums you could use too... paper, pencils, chalks, inks, paint, markers, etc., etc. It's not a one layer week, so let your imagination roam...but remember that WHITE SPACE!
Stearic Hydrazide – See Stearic Acid.
This is a pretty easy dish and I think I'll probably be making it again at some point.
My father was strict, realistic and tuff and my mother was wise, christian, churchy and naive. I am a mixture of both but had to learn how to be strong and not tuff because I am Lady. Then all of the other things balancing was hard.
The island archipelagos are starting to submerge
As if you want to know why
Total Time: 00:23:15
I am his safe place.
Natalie Portman is an Autumn, so this screaming fuchsia dress is an instant NO. She’d have been better off with the entire gown in that deep red (the accent color at the top of the gown) and having the accent fuchsia.
All things aside, i like it so far. The cloves and anise flavor are subtle as to not over power your tastebuds, while the slight banana leaves the finish clean. This is definitely a brew that i am going to have to stash a few bottles in my "file cabinet of goodness" to let mature. If for nothing else to let it de-carbonate a little and thicken up...
﻿At the French foreign minister's right, a Lebanese softly translated the woman's dreadful words.
8. be aware distractions and dry times will come. This is where having an established relationship with God will help. This is where knowing His promises will help. This is where having a good group of people (friends/housegroup) who can encourage you and inspire you and walk with you and challenge you helps.
BUT it is a bank holiday weekend and I am going away to a part of the country that is green. I will be surrounded by green. It makes me feel different, almost physically. It soothes me, drains the stress and replaces it with mellowness and benevolence and goodwill towards all. My squinty red eyes, hunched shoulders, frowny face will all melt into a big mellow grin. I need a dose of my green quickly. Roll on Friday.
So take an eye,
dragging his bone over town
FAMILY MATTERS: There’s quite a bit of shark gore here and a few choice bad words.
Hops - up to you!
The power of this narrative thread is even more significant when it comes to presenting history to children. We talk to kids about basic facts and important people in order to give them a foundational understanding of a historical event. Not only do these necessary simplifications demand a strong narrative to make them understandable (and interesting), they also blur facts that may complicate or confuse that narrative. As a result of this blurring, historical figures in children’s books are usually not real people. Instead they represent clearly defined values or ideas that support the direction of the narrative. In many respects, this makes stories told about, for example, the Founding Fathers very close in form to ones told about the gods and goddesses of Mt. Olympus.
This week we're giving away a copy of Tricia Goyer's new book By the Light of the Silvery Moon. This week we're doing things a little different! Winner will be chosen from the commenters who leave genuine comments on this week's posts (and be sure to leave your e-mail address)! Winner will be announced next week on the Weekly Pearl!!
You are shown the four pieces of cardboard shown below.
Her: I’m waiting for someone special.
Favorite TV show: Family Guy.
Last night I was thinking about the blog and how after my court rant post there didn't seem to be anything blogworthy to talk about today.
Using the Sandbell will improve your grip strength. If you have MMA groups or have an interest in lifting heavy, this gives added benefit to your cross training. Shoulder stability is also vastly improved. In a society of computers and office jobs, shoulder and Thorax mobilisation is a huge factor and contributor to neck and back pain.
The two teas served were Tiekuanyin Oolong from Taiwan and Tulsi, a herbal tisane.
The lovely folks at Acanthus Press have made a copy available to give away to you, dear readers! Just leave a comment to this post by midnight CST on Monday, May 14 to be eligible. You can leave any sort of a comment, but of course I always like to hear nice words about the blog. Nice or not, though, all comments will be numbered and the winner selected by random number generator on Tuesday. Bonne chance!
-Ribbon Trim
I started thinking about attending the university I’ve been trying to transfer to for the past couple of years; I mean, I’ve been accepted, been getting all the e-mails and letters from them to continue on with registration and such. I even got a brochure from their honors program, which if I attended the university I had all intentions of completing. Thing is, the place is freaking huge and is, of course, only getting more expensive each year.
72. When Dick Gibson was a little boy he was not Dick Gibson. —Stanley Elkin, The Dick Gibson Show (1971)
"Our programme is simple. We want to rule Italy".
*) Permit public (U.S.) schools and public airwaves to be used to convert non-Muslims.
Sensuality has become a lost art in the current fast paced world. It is no longer appreciated and most of the time, it is not even part of the picture. To be completely honest, I never really thought much about it, but it is something that was encouraged when I was a traditional dancer, and it is something that has come up a lot recently in yoga. So much so, that it has raised some questions in my head.
It's almost like peanut butter was created just for this purpose. It's better than whipped cream, better than chocolate syrup, or any kind of fruit flavored ice cream topping, or any other such condiment. In fact, if used in just the right amounts, and of sufficiently high quality, it is more in keeping with the overall flavor and texture of the normal female bodily fluids which I assure you shall be produced in abundance, and yet the peanut butter will augment and compliment the flavor, even to the majority of those who are naturally squeamish about such activities as this. Such is not the case, alas, with the other more commonly used substances I have mentioned.
Before we proceed i will want you to know what i have in mind after talking with my lawyer in a discussion which lasted for hours.Firstly i want you to know a few things about my personal life and this is that I am a family man with two children and a lovely wife and i just celebrated 30 years of gainful employment at my bank where i work.I am a man with reputation earned from my good work in my place of work.
This is the beginning of my background. Gears are a bit cliche`, but I love them anyway!
What does this say about society now-a-days? It’s bad enough completely bias media warps the weaker brains into believing every word they utter…as they calmly tell the masses, that they want to panic, not to panic. If a homeless person came barreling through a subway platform yelling about a giant green rat that emerged from a tunnel to eat commuters, what would you do? Believe him? What if your MTA employee said the same thing? What would you do then?
A rose smells so sweet in the summer. When I get home from Baba and Pappy's house, I'll give you a kiss.
They are at their house too......
This year, 63% of every dollar spent at every retailer in the United States will be on a payment card, and every retailer that accepts Visa, MasterCard, Discover, or a combination of these cards, needs to be PCI compliant. Some believe that PCI audits are critical to the payment process, while others bristle at the requirements.
Well, thanks for stopping by today. I hope you have a great day!
Mr Gowlland was 'invited to withdraw' from preaching and leading worship for a period of two months. Since the kind invitation was clearly extended with more than an inference of obligatory acceptance, it is not unreasonable to infer that it amounts to suspension. We can quibble over terms, but Mr Gowlland is in no doubt that his ministry has been suspended, and the OED concurs. Certainly, he is not permitted to minister. If that is not suspension, His Grace does not know what is.
The pollen cell, while it's doing this, is also expressing the Lock version of its genes. Let's say it got version 2 of the self-compatibility gene(s), so it's making Lock2. The stigma (the female part of the plant, in which all this activity is happening), meanwhile, is making keys that fit its particular genes. If the stigma is making Key3 and Key4, or any combination that doesn't include Key2, then the pollen tube keeps going until fertilization happens, and eventually you have a seed. But if it's making Key2, the Key2 fits the Lock2, the pollen tube stops construction and is soon torn down, and you wind up with no seed from that particular grain of pollen.
They even hacked away and thinned the hedge,
As always, feel free to share any information gleaned from this blog – repost, reprint and pass it on. All I ask is that you give me credit as the source of the information, and include a link back to the blog. Thank you. Cindi Myers
Hello, everyone! I hope you all had wonderful weekends! We have been busy here shipping lots of goodies out. It is so fun to see the stamps and paper going out the door because that means we get to see your creations soon! :)
1cup powdered sugar
“Some 1ml syringes,” I repeated “I'd like five Steri-Boxes.”
I started with the vegetable consomme (check out the menu), which was a vegetable soup in a light broth with a strong truffle flavor. This was quite good: the vegetables were fresh, the soup was not too heavy, and the truffle flavor enhanced the soup. My wife pointed out, though, that this may not have been completely vegetarian, because it may not have been made with a vegetarian stock. (Normally, I wouldn’t have ordered a soup if I knew it was made with non-vegetarian stock, but it didn’t occur to me to ask while I was there unfortunately. If you’re considering it, you may want to ask.)
“Then Peter and the other apostles answered and said, We ought to obey God rather than men.”
We started the session off by discussing our new apartment. There are issues with the apartment that me and my SO have issue with, and she discussed with me how there is perfection in imperfection. Sometimes, we try so hard to create this pretty picture that is in our head, and in so doing, we end up making things even worse. Which I can understand. Luckily, my SO has gotten a bit more laid back about the state of the apt. Hopefully that will be resolved soon.
i remember you were trying to get the little thingy at the end of the line all ready (can you tell i haven't any fishing experience?) and tried helping thread the line through the pole. this was no easy process i could tell. it got caught and twisted and tangled after the first toss. you cussed. it was soo tangled that you had to cut it and start it all over again. i giggled softly to myself, trying to lighten the mood, cause you were pretty worked up. finally. it was ready. and it was my turn to throw it out. it was starting to get dark, so i only had couple turns. no fish.
You’ve been there before and then you know what to do when you see that behavior happen or when you see that circumstance.
Prime Minister Julia Gillard on an aerial tour of the town of Emerald called the disaster area as “truly startling.”
Let’s start up with the Top Ten things I don’t want for Christmas. My main reason for this is because I usually get this kind of stuff every year.
and talking about trying out something new...I have been trying out something new too,lol.
Much to my dismay, neither of my adult kids eat very healthfully. However, my seven-year-old granddaughter seems interested in my dietary habits. So last night, I sat at the table and made out a simple chart of the basic food groups, and how many servings one needs, accounting for variances for my adult status and her kid’s one.
Firstly, the application is cross-platform. It runs natively on PC and Mac and on selected phones. For most of the apps that I use I couldn’t care if they don’t run on a PC, but our team are on both PC’s and Mac’s and so here finally is something I can rave on about that they can also use.
New standards for lighting will be implemented beginning in 2012. The goal is energy efficiency, and new light bulbs will have to use 25 percent less energy than today’s incandescents to produce the same amount of light. The current 100 watt bulb cannot meet the new standards this year, but there are some alternative choices.
I had originally pictured smooth, seamless drywall with a dividing shelf in the middle, but we are nowhere near that skill level to make something like that look acceptable. So we headed to the garage...
The government also listed some of the irrigation projects it planned to embark on, promising that the revitalisation of the irrigation projects would increase the local production of rice by over 400,000 tonnes per year.
*Nathan told me last week he kind of hates leather shorts. That made me sad. But it didn't make me not wear them!
Announcing that it would review the constitutionality of the so-called ObamaCare program, the Kangaroo (supreme) Court has agreed to examine, among other things, whether the individual mandate to buy government-defined “insurance” or the coverage by the states is UNconstitutional.
In my arms so tight
· In most circles, House of Pain's "Jump Around" is not considered traditional Irish music.
He said, "That's corny."
R.A. Heinlein's classic, "The Moon Is a Harsh Mistress", (and here) was the first place I read of revolutionary cells. Each cell has a small number of members, three to five, so that everyone is thoroughly known before they're admitted. His organization, though, had a vertical component as well: each cell had someone who contacted someone in another cell. Eventually, this organization had a head.
I had attended the first St Louis’s TNA Lockdown and though I felt as if the fan interaction was worth it, the PPV had been a disappointment in my opinion. I must confess I enjoy attending independent wrestling over going too today’s “Big Two”.
Now for the recipe . . . Enjoy!
Keep it short. Remember that your subscribers are doing you a favor by helping you make your marketing campaign better. Try to keep the estimated completion time to five minutes or less.
This is the main thing the boss was in trouble for, along with her many other complaints. The next week was crazy. Not so much for me as I was mostly a bystander, but for the boss and the Worthless Co-Worker. Conference calls and visits occurred and no one was talking to me about what was going on. Slowly but surely though things were coming out about her litany of complaints though.
or with whom would she want
Super busy day today: my first ballet class in years, a Wyoming Players board meeting, and a Play Reading Committee meeting. After coming home and pulling weeds for an hour, Mike and I went to Kohl’s to use my $25 gift certificate and had dinner at an Indian restaurant. We were supposed to then see a 9:20 movie, but I was too tired. In fact, I was asleep by the time it started.
Jean Rhys wrote this as a novelistic, literary response to Charlotte Bronte‘s classic and brilliant 19th century novel, Jane Eyre. (If you haven’t read the latter, it is not necessary to do so first, to appreciate Rhys’ work; however, if you do read it first, and Wide Sargasso Sea afterwards, inevitably, I think, you will gain a richer, deeper appreciation of just how clever and powerful Rhys is in this novella and will see it as a sort of dialogue across the centuries between two brilliant novelists from two vastly different childhoods and life experiences.)
Yarrow (Achillea millefolium) is an aromatic member of the Asteraceae (Compositae) family. This perennial European native with lovely, fern-like foliage is also named millefoil, or thousand leaves, because of its finely-divided leaves.
Estre, a Teutonic goddess of the rising light of day and spring, which deity, however, is otherwise unknown, even in the Edda…April was called easter-monadh
Pickled Ginger
02 - The Mob Rules
His name (pronounced and spelled as you'd expect) is...
I crying louder now. Why am I still life…
the Pierce Arrow
CARLIN: Yeah, it was my idea, because I was a big fan of
Author: Wikipedia: “Lester del Rey (June 2, 1915 – May 10, 1993) was an American science fiction author and editor. Del Rey was the author of many of the Winston Science Fiction juvenile SF series, and the editor at Del Rey Books, the fantasy and science fiction branch of Ballantine Books, along with his fourth wife Judy-Lynn del Rey.”
Suggestions of what it could be?
It was now a week before BHM. The knee would only start to annoy after the 10th km. Increasing the distance to 15 km was deadly. So, my earlier statement of only 21 km now seemed unmanageable. Without a proper diagnosis, I wasn’t able start rehabilitating. And I didn’t want to seek professional help, simply because it’s expensive. So I tried everything I knew to minimize the pain; to get me through BHM at least.
The Boers preferred to live in open spaces large enough that they did not see the smoke of their neighbours.
“Ok. I come from a world that’s full of the kind of people you’d find in comics. But unlike those stories… That’s all we have there. We only accept people with special talents.”
My side, things are going well so far with my family preparations. I am in the midst of preparing & printing the invitation cards for Noormy's engagement ceremony. By middle of next week I will distribute the cards out. Don't get me wrong, I know when I said printing the invitation cards the ceremony sounds huge but it's not. I am only printing 100 pieces (that's the least the 'Quick Copy' shop) who is also my friend will print for me. And I do need cards distributed especially for Noormy's office friends, my son's boss and family and for Aya's office friends. The rest, like my neighbors and friends nearby we do the inviting by what we called 'Seruk' (Sarawak Malay local word) . This is done by me asking one person and he or she will pass the word around to the neighbors. Easy :)
Tell them habits inhibit woman
1 And it happened that while Apollos was at Corinth, Paul passed through the inland country and came to Ephesus. There he found some disciples.2 And he said to them, Did you receive the Holy Spirit when you believed? And they said, No, we have not even heard that there is a Holy Spirit.3 And he said, Into what then were you baptized? They said, Into John's baptism.4 And Paul said, John baptized with the baptism of repentance, telling the people to believe in the one who was to come after him, that is, Jesus.5 On hearing this, they were baptized in the name of the Lord Jesus.6 And when Paul had laid his hands on them, the Holy Spirit came on them, and they began speaking in tongues and prophesying.
Now run along and get shopping, this expires 5.1.2012 at midnight CST.
Zach wanted another turn. He liked my "God bless..." prayer. So he put his own spin on it with "God loves me. God loves Teagan. God loves Mommy. God loves Daddy."
I've dug out my favourtie neglected lili of the valley rosie with birthday cake infact i dont actually recall ever using her! that's naughty!! hehe! I really enjoyed making this card for this special occasion as it's A not a colour combo i'd normally use!! and B i had so much fun with the ballons hehe!! and C I got to use all my new papers and die cut balloon embellishments!!!
Deep down, I felt it should not have to be this way. Really. I can be the most organized and hard working and right on top of my game, and I honestly do have the best team of people working for me, but at the end of the day, it doesn't change the hard fact that I am working in an industry that does not give allowances for things that are so important - like regular family and rest times when everyone else is resting and having fun together, or attending my friends' weddings, or birthday parties, enjoying long weekend BBQs together, going on spontaneous last minute dates or holidays, grieving time if someone I know has died, celebration time if someone close to me has given birth, being there if someone I know is really unwell or needs my help, or when I get really really sick. We photographers are expected to pick everything up, suck it in, and carry on because our time is never our own.
Once again I was so impressed with all they already knew. I wrote their windy facts on chart paper and we review them each day.
Maynooth Jewellers stand to gain a lot from a successful implementation of this system. It is an ideal platform on which to advertise new items of stock and also draw reference to sale items. Also this campaign is highly compatible with use on Facebook and Twitter. Not only will Maynooth Jewellers be reaching those who directly engage with the initiative, all friends of the shop will be able to view the interaction through Maynooth Jewellers’ profile pages and friends of those who use the system can view the interaction through their home pages and notifications.
The creator of the Tulip Chair and Table — architect Eero Saarinen -- studied sculpture at Académie de la Grande Chaumière in Paris, prior to emigrating to the U.S. to study architecture. This background provided him with a unique sensitivity to form in his buildings and furniture designs, in which he strove for "consistency and relatedness of all parts." Makes sense that the architect behind the St. Louis Arch and JFK's TWA Terminal was also a sculptor, doesn't it?
One word.
MJ: You have toured with the likes of Dizzee Rascal and The Prodigy, how does it feel to be alongside such big acts?
Before you mock Mr Parkes as a half-wit and a fantasist, please note that he does not believe the alien is his biological mother. The creature visited him when he was a baby and sent the following telepathic message to his infant brain:
It is often the choice of actors that makes a great film. The choice of Johannes Zeiler, a low-profile German TV actor in the title role of Faust had probably much to do with the German connection to the making of the film in the German language rather than in Russian. And Zeiler proves his mettle. However, the real actor of the film who steals the show is Anton Adasinsky, the Russian actor, who plays the moneylender Mauricius. Adasinsky is a rock musician and a pantomime actor of considerable repute. Adasinsky is able to present a Satanic figure that both repels and appeals to the viewer. It is amazing to study Adasinsky slip into a grotesque reptile-like asexual appearance from a Shylock-like respectable usurer. What is even more curious is the use of the German actress Hana Schygulla who appears briefly as Mauricius’ wife, to symbolize death. Her appearances on screen merely denotes the arrival of death in the story, much like importance of the clock for the Burton/Marlowe version.
I just had to share. I think I’ve blogged before about making pizza with leftovers. There was a time where as long as I put it on a crust and called it pizza, the kids would eat it. We had sesame chicken pizza, taco pizza, and more that I’ve forgotten. Anyway, last night I decided to make a pizza again and was too lazy to go find my dough recipe. As I was googling, I came across this one.
sort of picture to go with it. Example: a picture of a fairyand then words that kinda go with the picture.
mLearning: The New Frontier of Nursing Education (MDCL 1110)
When you remove the bread salad from the oven, toss it with the arugula, salt and pepper and more drippings or viniagrette to taste. Don't be shy with the greens - they wilt and shrink when tossed with the warm bread.
Accepting personal liability for debts because there are insufficient funds in the company is not a long-term strategy for an administrator.
My dad is intentional, deliberate, and deeply present. His involvement both in the midst of things and especially from the sidelines has been one of the steadiest undercurrents of my life--all the little notes like this one every time I had a test I was worried about or an important volleyball game, every first day of school, every accomplishment.
"Everything beckons to us to perceive it," says Rilke — EVERYTHING — and I take his counsel seriously. In my daily journeys, I do my best to observe not only the larger forms that dominate the landscape, but also the smaller fragments that either make up or adorn these forms. I try to look beyond the obvious, to see the overlooked and forgotten. I try to "see beyond what is seen," for lack of a better expression, and to become intimate with everything, including the lost, the fallen, and the degraded. Above all, I resist the temptation to ignore things that are not easily identifiable. In my experience, true beauty seldom lends itself to names, labels, or classifications.
expense of big beers, you extreme crybabies; everyone's gaining), and the whole idea of a lower-alcohol, higher-flavor beer is gaining momentum. Why not? Because some people think it should cost less? News for you: thousands of cans sold disagree with you. I do think we'll have to have this pricing issue out one of these days, but the people have spoken, for now: they're willing to pay for flavor, even if a smaller group
To nothing
But now it's September, and a time for a fresh start and a new copybook ready to be blotted. It is time to Be Positive and jolt Penny Dolan's Dire Diary blog a bit closer to what I'd like it to be. So I am creating some new categories. They aren't stunning but maybe they'll help me get blogging more often.
Salt, to taste
Why would this Elizabeth Warren try to convince us that she is "native American?" That is a bit strange. Assuming she is indeed 1/32 "Indian" that does not make her a minority. Ridiculous. She may be 1/32 Cherokee (or whatever) but she is 100 percent buffoon.
But I feel you can’t go wrong with the blues.
Avery loves, loves, loves the Disney princesses! She says "Rora" for Aurora. "Rella" for Cinderella and "Belle."
-Coaching is the best model for teaching (I am not saying for learning). In most classrooms there is at best a 1 teacher to 20 student ratio. In many schools this is much higher. Many teachers I know share that at least 4 of the children in their classroom are disruptive on a regular basis. Okay that is 20%. How many of the other children are distracted enough by the disruptions that their learning is affected negatively? I am going to low ball this and say another 4. Now we are at 40%. Now lets add another 4 who for whatever reason are not engaged in the lesson. I could list a number of reasons (hungry, tired, scared, have different learning styles, etc.). Now we are at 60% and we have majority in our 20 student classroom.
I visited everyone who visited me...although I have a sneaking feeling I may have missed one or two...but not as often as I would have liked, and I only initiated contact with precious few. April turned out to be shockingly busy in other aspects of my life, so while reading A to Z posts proved to be a fun getaway during a free hour here and there, I wasn't able to give it the focus I'd hoped to.
Meanwhile, Sarawak DAP secretary Chong Chieng Jen has asked its members to turn out in full force for the sit-in rally.
I used a Martha Stewart edging punch on the card and some of the backing papers to create the layered effect.
The pic above is one the last two 24th Street Station 8x8's that I'll be listing on Etsy today.
Open door holy
He may be a man with a sandwich board in Oxford Street or an American Christianist who expects the Book of Revelation to happen tomorrow. But he’s equally likely to be a scientist warning about asteroid impacts, super-eruptions, molecule-sized robots turning everything into grey goo or, not so long ago, the descent of Earth into a new ice age. Taking all these possibilities into account, Sir Martin Rees, the great cosmologist, says humans only have a 50/50 chance of making it into the next century. Yeah, right!
7. Ride - Dreams Burn Down
Falling off a roof?
Important lessons were learned (when applying Benefit Lip Plump, you want to aim for two dots, blended well, rather than applying a full coat as you would with lipgloss), accessories were admired, politics (or at least political posters) were discussed and a birthday was celebrated.
Andrew Napolitano:
So what?
Happy Quilting for now!
I’d love to change my hair color to something like blue, pink, green, purple… But, the place where I work at won’t allow me to do so. Instead I use all the color I want on my nails. You’ll almost never see me with my nails unpainted.
This is actually the first one of these I’ve written in well over a month. I wrote the six prior weeks worth of these in a big rush, all of them Blu-Ray versions I picked up during the Criterion Valentine’s Day sale. But I’ve since exhausted my stock of them and it’s time to dip back into the wild world of Hulu offerings. It’s a little like coming home, except in the last few weeks home has stocked a bunch more goodies. It’s one of those more recent offerings that we take a look at today.
Jaws was the first “Summer Blockbuster” film of it’s kind.
Please note: The aim of this action is that we bring unknown, good blogs to light, so it is probably best to choose great blogs that are just starting out or who don't have a lot of followers. Not a requirement...just a suggestion!
Here’s a partial list of common probing activities. Readers will be able to add many more examples of their own:
And for a snack or a sweet treat after dinner I tried these Healthy No Bake Energy Balls. These definitely satisfied that "need for a sweet" that I tend to have after dinner. They really tasted like a guilt free version of cookie dough.
I just started crying, I couldn't even hold it back. So she goes on to explain that sometimes people have what is called a vanishing twin. Where one baby doesn't develop all the way early in pregnancy and either your body absorbs it or you miscarry it later. She said that may be what happened but we don't know for sure till she sends the mass to be tested. She said it could also be hemorrhaging or a few other things.
I have been very kindly awarded the fantastic Zombie Rabbit Award by the delightful Jenny B from Memoirs of Scream Queen. I have only just discovered Jenny’s wonderfully quirky blog and I’m very glad I did. The gorgeous Ms. B. offers her own unique perspective on all things horror from reviews to fashion, and there’s music too. What more could you want? Check her out.
“And?” I asked. “What’s that got to do with me?”
At this point I turned around and headed for the car.
The fire burns while the pen is in my hand,
Two brother guinea pigs were the first addition to my apartment lifestyle. Pedro and Pisco lived an indoor life, helping consume veggie scraps and occasionally pillaging the front communal lawn of my South Yarra apartment. Then I came to own Gil, the animated Goldfish who kept watch from his bowl atop my fridge. Then I had an overwhelming desire to cultivate; and chilli plants, lettuce, and herbs, soon peppered my windowsills.
Of the top fifty most borrowed authors for both adults and children, I reckon that eleven of them are primarily picture book authors. Our wonderful children's Laureate and creator of the classic and much-loved Gruffalo, Julia Donaldson, comes at no surprise as number 7 on the list, but to find Eric Hill (number 28) of Spot the Dog fame so far ahead of Stephen King (100), Jeffrey Archer (101), J K Rowling (102) or Stephanie Meyer (121) surely gladens the picture book enthusiast's heart!
He asked where was the wine. I poured with shaking hand,
“It has a wonderful, customizable fit. No leaks or pooy blow-outs, the inserts are so absorbent. They fit under all pants, even tight jeans.”
1) Set up a creative environment that’s habit forming. Creativity doesn’t just happen, it’s a disciplined skill that can be learned. Creativity is not a mystical, elusive gift that’s only accessible to artists. Everyone can develop it. Set up the right conditions and it eventually kicks-in. For me, it’s the act of daily planning that clears my mind to make room for ideas to flow. For you, it might be puttering in your garden or going for a walk. Whatever it is, do it daily and be disciplined about it.
The hard types of the mason's knife,
I guess Coz, serves to hide my eyes
Minutes later, after a number of calls to 911, police arrested 43-year-old Charles Anthony Edwards III of San Francisco on suspicion of murder. Authorities declined to say how the encounter started and what led to her vicious slaying.
$0.70 off Kellogg's Special K Cinnamon Pecan
Day 2 of Question week. How are you liking the questions so far??
Anyway, the deal is that my hard drive is toast. My data is backed up (THANK YOU HUBS, OMG THANK YOU THANK YOU THANK YOU) but since the computer is still under warranty, I can't just throw a new drive in there without voiding it and I have to have Apple do the repairs, which will be for free, at least. But they had to order the drive, which won't come in until Wednesday or Thursday and so... I wait. I'm trying another Apple store this afternoon, which will mean THREE trips to the Apple store in the last three days. They're nice people in there, though; and they all wear blue.
Nap is not entirely sure he approves of the newfangled Eiffel Tower, but he permits Paris to keep it.
Now, why is this such an important aspect of the economy of our great country, and important enough to devote the time and energy to write about this to the 3 regular readers of my humble blog?
Since this madness is not likely to end anytime soon, let’s push it further! What sort of novelty genre remix do you want to hear from her? Hmm… I’d love for Quiet Village to get back and give her a luxurious exotica massage. A full-on lounge or David Lynchian one could work, and a trip-hop take can be wonderful if done right. You’ll never know, since my favorite mix of “Video Games” is an actually awesome drum-n-bass mix by Jakwob & Etherwood.
(1) develop proficiency with the tools of technology
I used to be really into throwing up a peace sign for any photo someone took of me. Maybe for like the last five years or so. There's probably a trend I was subconsciously following, or some mass-mind shift, as a lot of things I get into end up being. I generally find myself knowing about or getting really into stuff at the same time it reaches it's peak popularity, just like most people (simple equation, really.) I don't feel too bad about it, cause I'm not someone who prefers obscure things. There's a lot of value in things that millions of people adore, and just because everyone else in the world has a deep, personal connection with Fleetwood Mac or Motown, that doesn't make mine any less important to me.
In front of the back four the shape needs to be immaculate. If just one player isn’t covering enough ground or doesn’t have the awareness to close off space in the right areas there’s a knock-on effect, which quite likely would render the approach dangerously ineffective.
The cologne. I didn’t even bother opening this. The sample is very, very small and it came in a sealed, translucent, waxy paper bag with a postcard in it. It’s all I have to say about it, really. 30 mL retails for $60 CAD, while 200 mL retails for $165 CAD.
Gregg I.
Pay the bills, RSVP to 3 kid's birthday parties, find the mini lego viking man's sword for the 10th time today, put in a load of laundry, play a game of Hide-n-seek, and clip the dog's nails.
Belt - Zara
This is a shrewd and significant move by Author Solutions—perhaps one of the most significant moves ever in the relatively short modern history of author solution services globally. In some ways this is Author Solutions first attempt at check on the self-publishing industry, and though the king may find its path of escape this time, one feels that Author Solutions or some other such entity in the not too distant future will declare checkmate. There will be no escape and author solutions services will finally subsume themselves within the publishing monolith for good and the determinable lines in the sand between what publishing is and what publishing services are will become indistinguishable .
But the seeds that have touched me most, must have been the tomato seeds that a friend took out of his pockets after the funeral of a very good friend. “Well, look what I find here in my pockets”, he said, “tomato seeds”. That’s about all I needed to realise deep inside that life went on, and that it was good.
Then everything went black.
System Requirements
While at work today, my co-teacher tells me that not only has the landlord fixed the problem under my sink (which actually turned out to be a faulty water heater) but he’s also taken out my recycling for me. Little is said about whether there is still water on the floor, except that I should turn on my ondong floor heating system so that whatever water remains will dry more quickly.
When I get to the office, my day will depend on the emails that are coming in. I always start with a list of things to do, but this often gets pushed aside as urgent things come in! I meet with editors mid-morning or mid-afternoon, so I’ll be preparing texts and pitches. I also negotiate contracts, edit texts, look after our social media (blog, twitter, website), look at artwork, manage bespoke writing projects, call editors and meet new authors/author illustrators. All this takes me to around to 6pm/7pm and then I head home, tackling submissions on the train back.
Fever has a seriously great ending. In the last few chapters epic, crazy, scary thing happens after epic, crazy, scary thing and I absolutely raced to get to the end. There’s an interesting cliff hanger to this book which makes me excited to see what Lauren DeStefano pulls out of the bag in the final book to this trilogy. If you loved Wither I don’t think that Fever will disappoint you. I loved this book just as much as the first and am pleased to say that it didn’t suffer from middle book syndrome at all.
In an instant, I realized that although I had many more than forty reasons to be happy, I wasn’t taking the time to appreciate many, if any of them, that day.
There were many great shampoos in the seventies. Here are just a couple of other shampoos that were popular when I was obsessing over my split ends.
~ Sweep kitchen floor
Rock and no water and the sandy road
Woke to my hearing from harbor and neighbor wood
Enough preamble--to the beers!
Which are outlined in my heart!
She said she would remain positive about the country and would continue to speak well of it, but would not keep quiet about crime. According to her, good leaders were necessary to take back the country from criminals.
G'night!
I have been pretty focused lately. I survived the A to Z challenge with confidence and the accomplishment really motived me to get going this week on outlining my novel. It is May 2 and I got distracted.
Spiitin fire to bring him fame
Of the 30,000 documents that Toni and her team have uncovered and are busy uploading to their database, one story in particular has stood out to her and stands as a shining example of the intrinsic worth of their particular type of historical research. “In our research we uncovered a story about a group of enslaved ancestors at Jehosee Plantation, near Edisto. One of the women in the group went to gather berries in the woods and was bitten by a rattlesnake. Two of the enslaved men that were there, quite possibly without the permission of the overseer, carried this woman on their backs to Charleston to be treated by Dr. Charles. This story is downright heroic and shows the sheer determination and fortitude of these enslaved ancestors.”
I also did a little Konad but you can see this more as a little experimenting. I'm not sure if I like the tips but the design is nice. I used H&M Love at First Sight as my stamping polish and Konad Imageplate M60 for the design.
This spring, I spent time each week learning about the European Union, ag policy and globalization of the agriculture industry from our professor and a variety of guest lecturers. In addition to class time, we visited Monsanto and Bunge in St. Louis, ADM in Decatur and the SUPERVALU distribution center in Urbana. The Saturday following finals week, 25 students and I packed our bags and boarded a bus to Chicago, Illinois. Seventeen hours, two flights, two bus rides and one walk up a winding cobblestone street later, we arrived at our first destination in Leuven, Belgium.
The authorities have been unable to assess the extent of damage caused by the disaster as most parts of the villages are buried in the mud avalanche.
Twelve years later, Jennet, too, was accused of witchcraft, along with 16 others, by 10-year-old Edmund Robinson. They were found guilty, but the case was referred to a Privy Council, due to lack of evidence (owed in part to England’s growing skepticism over witchcraft). Edmund admitted he lied, because of the stories he read about Jennet and the Pendle witch trial.
If you think that your church could benefit from the expertise and enthusiasm of a Latin American ‘reverse missionary’ then get in touch with us.
Dear RSV,
The messenger of death is mad
Shire Mynydd Gwyn: Mary Verch Thomas
Let’s dig in to the services offered.
Release the energy that you have created with this work and send it out into the universe to do your bidding.
the two volumes Adonis, Attis, Osiris. Anyone who is acquainted with
Ed remembers that this was the first black and white story he ever saw in a re-run in 1993. I keep noticing that there is a lot of stock footage used to signify night falling, waves crashing on the sand, and a rather hilarious group of Vikings on a Viking ship. Ed also makes a little reference to the new series which sends me into floods of laughter as Steven goes up to the monastery and bangs on the door, "he knocked four times." Ed also points out that if Saxons appeared in the series as it is today they wouldn't look they way they do in The Time Meddler.
To me, Kryon is stating that our soul contract is life affirming, helpful and necessary. Other writers disagree.
I love America, but why are you not listening to the people who suffer
Check out the queries and the votes at:
there are more and more raised concerns about quality, freshness and safety of the vegetables in your local market. The best way to be safe is to grow it yourself. I am going to go over a few of the ways that people can do this in the space they have.
Tony Garnier - bass
"Square dance"....now basted and waiting to be quilted..
A New Jersey man who survived accidentally shooting a 4-inch ( 10-cm) nail into his heart while trying to clear a jammed nail gun said on Friday he feels like he won the lottery.
on the number of wives a man could marry.With the reavelation, Islam put a cap on four wives. The permission to marry more than one wife is given under highly exceptional circumstances and with stringent conditions attached.
With the fundamental differences of materials creating quite different landscapes, each piece can have a sort of a one hit wonder appeal, and at times, especially in her works on paper, intricate material play becomes obsessive and tedious. The overall appeal of the show, however, much outshines its weaknesses and if nothing else, Donovan’s installations are memorable and consistently a delight.
Mocknick: The time, effort and expense pitching a known author is minimal, while pitching an unknown in a skiddish industry requires much more.
I also highly recommend introducing EEKK (elbow-to-elbow or knee-to-knee). I have this poster from Pinterest hanging in my room as an example and we modeled and practiced a lot as a whole group.
Many states that adopted the TNR method in the ’90s have already seen a decrease in their stray and feral cat population, Williams said.
Sun Shades: Protection From All Kinds of Weather
anyway, with that, i’d like to introduce you to my latest blogging series.
Shortcrust
This hymn is the appointed one for today (Palm Sunday) in Paul Wesley Chilcote’s The Song Forever New: Lent and Easter Meditations on Charles Wesley’s Hymns. He suggests using the tune ‘Ratisbon’ (the normal tune, for him at least, for ‘Christ Whose Glory Fills the Skies’). This morning I used ‘Heathlands’, the tune we use over here for the same hymn. I hope you enjoy it!
I wrote this post almost 2 years ago right after @MousetheDog earned his 22nd and 23rd titles, but I never found the right time to post it. I truly feel that some of the more valuable lessons I've learned came from dog showing. @MousetheDog was my first dog, and he was a spectacular and exceptionally well-tempered and forgiving creature. I'm so lucky that he tolerated all my mistakes.
The point of my story is this. Sometimes I wish God would show me all of the visual things I have missed in this life. On the other hand, it’s kind of cool to live in a world in which Aretha Franklin could be white. Martin Luther King’s dream that someday everyone will be judged by the content of their character, not by the color of their skin, is a reality with me, because I can never be absolutely sure who’s who.
Pillsbury Sweet Rolls or Grands Sweet Rolls $0.40/2
- Attend local performances with an open mind and confidence to talk to people.
Not really but I won the next best thing – Blog Awards!
My dogs. I only have one now, Dakota, but I'll always have a special place in my heart for Bridgette who passed away when I was 10 and Samson, better known as Sammy and Bubba, who was my childhood dog. We got him as a puppy from the pound and I grew up with him from the age of 7-20. He passed away a year ago and I miss him a lot.
Still, I have learned a few tricks over the past year. For example, taking photos from closer to the side of the stage will help bunch up spread out musicians. If you move about a bit and use a zoom lens, sometimes you can isolate the head of a singer against a less busy part of the background. And when the lighting is poor you can compensate by increasing the ISO setting on the camera. Unfortunately, this has a side effect of making the photos “noisy”. However, if you drop them into black and white and play with the contrast levels afterwards, the photos can take on a “grainy” quality, reminiscent of old music-press photos, which add mood and atmosphere.
A meatloaf dinner is always a welcomed meal around my house. I decided to really dial up the spice factor with this Masala Meatloaf. I loaded the meatloaf not only with spices, but lots of vegetables and lean meat so it was pretty healthy too. This meatloaf would go well with mashed potatoes, roasted vegetables like cauliflower, asparagus or a big salad. We actually ate it with rice and lentils and it was fabulous. My favorite part of making a big hearty meatloaf is we have leftovers for a few days and I'm all about leftover meatloaf sandwiches.
Oh well I'll just have to make up for it when I'm back in the summer.
I know, I know ~ I'm not officially on the list for Six Sentence Sunday. Don't blame anyone but me.
ScarbsF1 is a non commercial site, Please show your support….
I mean, yes, if she told me my ass looked like the cheesy side of Mars when I still had two games to go, 48 more times bending over at the foul line, it would have thrown me. There’s a timing issue involved.
5.J. OPEN CLASS
Professor Natalia Beylis -Professor Carol-Anne Connolly
Since I’m going to pay USD$40 for this painful lesson (can’t retract bid), I thought I should share my experience. I’ve already filed for a compliant, but if more people do so it’ll get Ebay’s attention more quickly. Please help spread the word around to prevent more people from getting cheated and to stop these unethical sellers. Thank you.
This quiet closeness is surprisingly profound. And really, really, really sexy. The tension builds to a fever pitch, and once you finally can't take it any more and start kissing, it's like fireworks are exploding. You feel incredibly connected, and even the most basic sex will suddenly be off the charts.
Of course it is the internet discussions (to use the term loosely) and controversy that is the best advertising possible for the up-coming series. Another slap across Moore's face is publicity you can't buy that was surely worth hundreds of thousands, if not a million or more, in ad dollars that DC did not have to shell out. The controversy over Before Watchmen is the best advertising. DC knew the fans would have strong opinions about Before Watchmen and was fully prepared to get through all the bad press. Even the renewed spotlight focused on the history between DC and Moore, in the deal given the creators where the rights would revert away from the company after the books went out of print that was not honored (so far) is just a blip on their concern-radar. Comic fans are used to exposure of the creatively shady practices of big business comics. People still purchase Batman even with the knowledge that for decades creators were "shafted" by today's standards. DC is undoubtedly monitoring the chatter and isn't that concerned.
When they show up on the White House lawn to demand the President’s formal surrender it’s from behind a giant spider robot like they had in that old episode of Jonny Quest. Replete with soldiers firing old M1 rifles at it.
Interesting Tidbit:
scarred with blood, bone and blessed Earth--
C. We Lose Talking To A Fool 26:4-5
This time I have been so inspired by everyones amazing and very embellished cards and projects I kind of had a play and this time I've made a bunting/pennent. The papers are from My Minds Eye again and I've used rolled cream flowers, the flourish was cut on my silhouette as are the butterflies which were cut on cream card and I've used my blender stub and added a little pencil to colour them. the ribbon and buttons are from Papermania - oh and the beautiful D'Arcy is coloured in pencils too.
The last varietal I will be talking about today is one that has gone from being a prominent grape to near extinction to prominence once again. This varietal is malbec. Traditionally, malbec is blended into the great Bordeaux wines along with cabernet sauvignon, caberenet franc, merlot and petite verdot. Nowadays, along with petite verdot, malbec is used sparingly in these blends. This is due to its near extinction in the 1950s when a severe frost nearly eradicated all the malbec in Bordeaux, France. While malbec’s popularity declined in France, it became very popular in South America, especially in Argentina and Chile. In fact, it became Argentina’s adopted national grape in the early 2000s when vitners began making malbecs of outstanding quality. It should come as no surprise that it is the most widely planted grape variety in all of South America. On its own, malbec can be a wine full of color and flavor, with notes of plums and dried fruits. Its medium tannins allow it to pair well with food or enjoyed on its own. Malbec is a very special varietal, it was nearly destroyed due to frost in France but had a rebirth in South America where it has become a national treasure.
Pinky Brain: Are you pondering what I’m pondering?
Choi (Lee) Tae Min
The current cultural difference between the Afrikaner & Boer can best be summarized with the following: the Afrikaner is neo colonial & tends to view all White Afrikaans speakers as being all part of the same group regardless of cultural distinctions while the Boers were & are anti-colonial / republican / independent oriented & view themselves as a distinct & separate entity from the greater White Afrikaans population as they are descended from the republican Boers & the Voortrekkers who were themselves descended from the frontier pastoralists & Trekboers who trekked away from the Western Cape centuries ago where the ancestors of those who would control the later emerging Afrikaner designation remained. This is an essential component to understanding the different outlooks within the greater White Afrikaans speaking population.
Defence Secretary Philip Hammond said the timetable for withdrawal remained on track despite this "cowardly attack".
I cannot help wondering now if somehow the case of Trayvon Martin does not serve as a terrible reminder both of what we aspire to become, and how very far we fall short of that ideal. We want to think of ourselves as a land of equality, a land of justice, a land of freedom, but in reality we have a long way to go. In a country and an era - 234 years after we expressed our desire for equality in our Declaration of Independence, 150 years after a Civil War fought over the same issue, and 50 years since Dr. King implored us to do better - in which we have accomplished so much, we have failed greatly at perhaps our most important and fundamental task - to ensure that we looked out for each other, respected each other, provided for each other, treated each other with dignity, and helped each other to equally and actively participate in planning our collective and individual futures. I do not care how far we think we have come, we have not come far enough. In a world in which one of every six Black men has been in jail, where one of every four Black people live in poverty, and where a man of any race, creed or color is so filled with misunderstanding and fear and hatred that he can gun down a Black teen in cold blood and get away with it, trying simply is not good enough.
-Take it in more through the waist... not a minor matter, since this will require partially removing some of the appliques in the waist area, performing the alteration, then reapplying the appliques. If you look closely enough, you may notice some slight bulging above and below one side of my waistline in some photos. This was the result of a "quick fix" - snugly applying an internal elastic waistband, intended to bring the fit closer to my waist in the torso area, where the leotard fabric had stretched over the course of many hours of holding it taut it while zig-zag stitching appliques onto it. It looks fine when I'm standing up straight, but when I bend or flex at the waist, the internal elastic waistband has the unfortunate effect of cutting into my waist, causing a bulge that looks like chub above and/or below it. Not cool, given the sleek lines that a ballgown of this sort is supposed to achieve! And a good lesson/reminder that quick fixes make for more work in the long run!
34But one of the Sanhedrin, a Pharisee named Gamaliel, a man of learning in the law, of whom all the people had a high opinion, got up and made a suggestion for the men to be put outside for a little time.
* Grokster didn’t develop filtering tools or other mechanisms to limit infringement through their software.
Don't even start singing it, I will smack you!
Thus, any modern Gnostic group or teacher must be carefully evaluated, based on subtle qualities that evidence real spiritual depth and understanding. Impressive lists of titles, degrees, and credentials mean little if there is no indication of a voice that speaks from the experience of gnosis. While it may be too much to expect that any given Gnostic teacher is going to be the embodiment of divine illumination, one still has the right to expect that those who talk the talk can walk the walk.
Census data from the fourth quarter of 2011 suggests that this is happening. While the nominal rate of construction of attached single-family starts remains low, 13,000 at seasonally adjusted annual rates for the end of 2011, townhouse construction increased in each quarter of last year.
Chandler was one of a number of African-American folk singers/songwriters who were performing during the 1960s, but with the exception of Richie Havens most of them aren't that well known today. Chandler was a classically trained musician (oboe was his first instrument) who didn't get interested in folk singing until he was in college. His first performance of folk songs were actually sung with the New Jersey Symphony Orchestra (he performed "Black Is the Color of My True Love's Hair" and "Wayfaring Stranger"). He started writing songs for Broadside and got involved in the Civil Rights Movement, and then got a record deal with Columbia. Among his compositions was the godawful novelty number "Beans in My Ears" as well as some songs written in support of the Black Panther Party. (You can check his full discography here, but other than a later e.p. and his work on the Credibility Gap comedy album, it doesn't go much beyond these 2 releases). He seems to have focused more on songwriting during the 1970s, and was a founder of the Alternative Chorus-Songwriters Showcase. He also moved to LA.
This first year of teaching was a tough one. I feel like I traded my personal life and the people that went with it to the effort of keeping my career afloat. At night, I'd go home, and still stress about school. It was an unending cycle of worry. One Friday night, after a ridiculous week, I picked up the Kindle and started reading. I read four books that weekend. It was wonderful. I didn't think about work, I didn't feel stressed, my heart wasn't trying to book an escape, and I was at ease with my life. Naturally, I liked the way I felt, so I continued reading. Since January, I've read 35 books. I feel that I can say with certainty that that's the more books read than I read in 8 years in high school and college combined. I've slowed down recently simply because I've run through my list that had been building up over time, but I still keep it with me and pull it out whenever I can. At the park, at home, at the pool, you’ll find me reading away!
Saul of Tarsus knew to whom he spoke. “I am Jesus whom thou persecutest.” But in our text in Acts 22:8, He said, “I am Jesus of Nazareth, whom thou persecutest.” He singled Himself out as there were, and are many who call themselves Jesus. Saul knew exactly Who it was who addressed him.
By the way, Juan Or no longer vomits on the way back home till this time of writing. Also, he was in his usual bubbly self all the way back home. Once home, he started asking for milk again and was able to jump, laugh, talk, kick, throw, etc. Mommy is relieved and is thankful that we still made it to the event and came back with 'rewards' and full stomach for both Juan Or and Mommy despite the vomitting and stomachache ordeal! ^_^
I wanted a really magical card for today, to celebrate Beltane, when the veil between worlds is thin and the Fey are travelling abroad.
Book: The Miles Between by Mary E. Pearson
So did Adam die when they ate of the fruit? No, he did not die physically, but he did die spiritually. In my post titled “Why Would a Loving God Allow Death and Suffering“ I talk about how this one act of disobedience toward God led to the downfall of all mankind. Because of this we are spiritually dead in our sins and our relationship with God is cut off. Mankind is guilty as charged when it comes to sin. Each and every one of us have violated the laws of God our day of reckoning is approaching.
Were there still
Ready for the router.
Jack’s Book: An Oral Biography of Jack Kerouac
Diagnostic Criteria
Ahem. Okay, we're done here ;)
Beliefs like “I’m not good enough, I need to change, I’m not worthy of Love, Money (x,y,z….)” combined with a WANT for these precise things equal a conflict in the messages we are sending to the Universe. I have seen person after person do affirmation work, loving their world, but NOT address core issues of doubt.
2. It is rumoured that the Silurians are stealing bodies to splice with Silurian DNA to make half-human/half-Silurians.
If you’re dead set on learning and are willing to practice, you might as well buy a few of the better quality art supplies because they will be a worthwhile investment.
Looking at how I have finished up 2 tubs of the same product, I believe you would already know how much I love this range of moisturizer. The hydro gel cream is said to be even more moisturizing than the hydro gel. It is also slightly more expensive. However, in my honest opinion, I think both are the same and give out the same results. In fact, I prefer the hydro gel better as the packaging is much more user friendly compared to the hydro gel cream.
My daughter came home from collage for the weekend and it was wonderful to visit with her, and I couldn't resist making a few treat boxes for her and her roommates, and another friend who is at the same collage- BYU-Idaho.
I decided I could go, but I knew I'd be wasting my time. My relative refused to take responsibility for his actions. He believed he was under a supernatural spell and only supernatural intervention would cure him. He blamed his addiction on his childhood, on the women he chose, and on the plain fact that he had never ever had any luck. What bullshit, I thought. What utter, utter rubbish. If in one of my conversations with him he had said that he wanted to change, or if any of my other relatives had said that he wanted to change, I would have been on the next flight to the island. Until my relative wanted to change, change wouldn't come.
Whether you end up being the president, a CEO, an artist, a carpenter or work at McDonalds, as long as you are happy that is most important.
In our reading series, there is a unit all about animal camouflage.
You have until December 31, 2011 to submit an entry.
Did you pause? To see? To stare in awe?
Boiled Down: Jolie. Psychological. Typical. Predictable. Boring.
In the state leaders meeting of the BRICS just closed in New Delhi, India proposed a series of positive proposals, hoping deepening the relations of the BRICS, strengthening cooperative mechanism of these countries and enlarging the role of the international economy and political life of these countries, which again embodies India’s all-round diplomatic policy. Therefore, it is groundless to think its “Look East Policy” and the American strategy of eastward transfer are converging.
Behind the scenes, Joseph Jackson pushed his sons to succeed. He was also reportedly known to become violent with them. Michael and his brothers spent endless hours rehearsing and polishing up their act. At first, the Jackson 5 played local gigs and built a strong following. They recorded one single on their own, “Big Boy” with the b-side “You’ve Changed,” but it failed to generate much interest.
"It's my maid's night off," Tom said helplessly.
"YOU PLANNED THIS" is what he said.
Are you mourning the passing of spring?
Gregory: so you do
FDR, often thought to be Labor’s champion, even its patron saint, had this to say about unions representing governmental employees:
I've made over 2,000 of them since I started a little over a year go. Its been fun...but quite honestly...I'm tired. Its hard to keep up with the uncertainty of orders, and its more than difficult keeping my cool when dealing with brides all day long :)
Today, I opened up my Tic-Tac-Toe app and grabbed some craisins (she especially loves fruit, they're a perfect reward/treat). She pecked, she got a craisin. She pecked, she got a craisin. Then, she just wanted the freakin craisins & she knew where they were. I tapped the screen with a craisin, she pecked, she got a craisin. Chickens are much easier to redirect than toddlers, FYI.
a spider and a fly
All in all, this movie was quite a good film and I’d definitely recommend it for true vintage, thriller film buffs. The director is fantastic and his idea of story goes far beyond what you see on the screen. For another good Ji-woon Kim film, definitely check out The Good, the Bad, the Weird. (Great acting and action.) I might even review that one soon. And for A Tale of Two Sisters American, not so good counterpart, check of The Uninvited (2009) featuring Emily Browning and Elizabeth Banks. I give A Tale of Two Sisters a 9 out of 10.
Now your teardrops turn to snowflakes
- Yext is in some way a Foursquare’s competitor since they have been providing locations database
The comic timing though is as impeccable as always, and there are numerous scenes which will elicit a smile (or a full-on belly laugh) from even the most curmudgeonly of readers. The scenes with Annie and her shrink (a prim and proper elderly gentleman who only has one client) are among the highlights here, but some of Duncan's insanely stupid ideas (including a certain toilet stop) rival them.
Sorry I'm so boring these days. In random news, I have been totally obsessed with this song lately. I don't even like Pink usually, but I love this song, and I cannot stop watching her grammy performance... it was amazing!
That final point is supported by a new report by Environmental Defence and Forest Ethics that states that the Northern Gateway pipeline would carry 100 million tonnes of carbon pollution each year.
The developer Forest City Ratner (led by Bruce Ratner) had been expecting additional corporate and taxpayer dollars to help raise the money necessary to build. The project itself takes a mix of things people can support, like new housing, development and entertainment (the proposed Nets basketball stadium) and overdoes each element compounding the poor judgment is the attempt to place all of this on a few blocks at one of the most congested points in Brooklyn, the intersection of Flatbush Avenue and Atlantic Avenue which itself intersects a block away with Fourth Avenue.
Junsu widen his eyes. “You want to sell me again?!”Ask Junsu trough his gritted teeth.
“Such a merger would represent a massive shift of power into the hands of a single, unelected bureaucrat. The Government should be taking this far more seriously and voicing its objections very strongly.”
No matter when it happened, it's time to get it back.
Then someone put on 'Hotel California' at full blast. D immediately got up to turn it down and in so doing turned it off.
I've been itching for ages to try and make some little tropical fish murrini and so there are Tangs in amongst barnacles (these look like they are hollow when encased as the core is clear glass) and ivory and fine silver laced murrini that I have pulled in to points.
Leave Real First & Last Name & Email Address
Why could I see my knee touching the floor, but not feel it? No clue.
They say that I went through the period of mindlessness that I described, because of the experimentation. That I was never truly a Mindless One. That it seemed the same as the Mindless One pattern of Hunger Frenzy and then Sentience, was purely coincidental. And the only reason the offspring gained Sentience at all, is because they came from me, a Born One. As my offspring create offspring, and their offspring create offspring, the phase of Sentience will eventually disappear completely. Ereshkigal is spitting with fury.
Tonight S will stealth feed the vinegary whey to her neighbor’s pig. We talked about how nicely all the farm animals work together when they’re able. The cows make abundant milk, the chickens and pigs drink the extra dairy and clean up after the cows by rooting through their dung and eating up the maggots. You know, just a little girl talk - farmer style.
Londo and I have been tossing around the idea of converting the Pookie's crib to a toddler bed. But when the Pookie wakes up in the morning, he sits in his crib for 30 minutes or more playing. He's confined and happy. I have time to get up and get ready before he's calling for me to get him. And it's hard to change something that's been working so well.
I laid out my fabric . . . a half yard was a hair short, I'll go for a larger piece next time to get more leg length for my growing boy . . . traced (being sure to stretch out the waist band to account for elastic gathering room) . . . and sewed up the inseam, waistband and bottom hems. A bit of elastic from my stash and PRESTO! 30 minute toddler pants. The boy quite likes them:
When you are comfortable with eat lunch and run, take yourself out for dinner. A restaurant with linen and silverware. You’re no less intriguing a person when you’re eating solo dessert to cleaning the whipped cream from the dish with your finger. In fact some people at full tables will wish they were where you were.
agreement between body and mind get impious
Am still looking.
When a self-conscious young woman discovers the boy in drama class is actually the immortal who painted the world into being, she becomes the target of another painter who could shatter not only her new sense of hope, but her world, as well.
all social and health services.
3. Economic and environmental benefit (because at this point, we should realize that the two walk hand in hand). I already mentioned the value of increased street traffic to local businesses. Trees also significantly reduce energy use & heating and cooling costs and increase both residential and commercial property values (are trees gentrifiers? We'll return to this in a moment). They also absorb and process stormwater without dumping it into NYC combined sewers, which saves the city real money in processing costs and overflow fines from the EPA and keeps those enormous puddles from forming at every intersection.
The ECJ stated that the proprietor of a trade mark may rely on his exclusive right as against an individual who sells trade marked goods online only when those sales took place in the context of commercial activity.
This week the Bitchin' Kitchen Supperclub Challenge was an old family recipe of Nadia G's - a potato cake filled with sausage, eggs and 3 kinds of cheese. Making the recipe vegan didn't seem like a great challenge. Making it healthier - now that was the challenge!
Sunday was a perfect day for painting plein air and I met up with my friends, Howard Rees and Bruce Hancock and we drove to Mokelumne Hill or as the locals call it Moke Hill. We started out painting in a remote area just before Moke Hill and then moved into town for an afternoon painting session. It was a full day of painting and good fun. It definitely was, "A Painting Day".
ultimately a success. There is a lot more that needs to be done to
I skipped my weekend laundry chore. I usually do laundry every Sunday. This weekend? I did not. Now my hamper is completely full and while I don't "need" to do the laundry because we have more than enough clothes, towels, ect... the full hamper is totally giving me anxiety and I'll do it tonight.
Lyman
May I introduce you to my friend Dolores, who has lived in Carroll Gardens all her life? One of the greatest pleasures of living in this neighborhood is to sit on Dolores' stoop on a summer evening and to listen to her stories about growing up, marrying and raising a son right here in Carroll Gardens.
Did not sleep last night.
Coastal Alabama
When he had been a her, before the Change rite, he remembers going through the witch initiation as Danni. The dream shell in his hands chimes. He opens his eyes, looks down at the hypnotic, glowing weave of it sitting in his fingers, and is swallowed up by the past.
3. In a large nonstick skillet, heat 2 tablespoons EVOO, two turns of the pan, over medium heat. Add the chicken and cook, turning once, until deeply golden, 10 minutes. Transfer to a platter and cover with foil. Add the remaining 1 tablespoon EVOO, one turn of the pan, to the skillet. Add the sliced lemon, garlic and capers and cook for 2 minutes. Stir in the wine and parsley and cook until reduced, 1 minute. Lower the heat and bring to a simmer.
This is a well crafted and truly creepy gothic mystery set in a believable English village. The gothic setting will be familiar to all North American readers who have seen any of the Sherlock Homes movies. However, the violence was overly explicit and there was more gore than I am comfortable with, even in a novel of the crime/suspense genre.
In every
Besides, one of my favorite blog pals seems to have abandoned her blog (and this is fair warning, Ms. you-know-who-you-are). It's a little disheartening, because our time zones are too out of sync to Tweet with much overlap of awakeness.
Because I was such a frightened child and overrun with hate for my peers but primarily for myself, while at school I would try to blend into the background and disappear into the woodwork, a strategy that rarely worked. But when I got to the safety of my own home, I would act up and act out, throwing tantrums and breaking things with no provocation. My mother’s response was to make me go outside and “fetch a switch from the tree.” She rarely actually used it on me; the idea was that the fear of having to fetch the instrument of my punishment would be enough to set me straight.
My job as "chair sitter" is to pull together the recommendations from the group and present them on Tuesday.
Flower; Tim Holtz Flower die, Memory Box Cherry Blossom for centre
It's the 20th....
1234. Olives from Whole Foods Market @ Home (Phoenixville, PA) 1:12 p.m.
SP came home with a surprise the other day. A child.
My partner had requested stars in her swap info, and around the time this swap started Elizabeth Hartman had started her sparkle punch QAL, so I exhibited a total lack of imagination and went with a sparkle punch made from solids ;) I did make a small change, and used 2.5" squares instead of 3.5". The colours are based loosely on my partner's mosaic - I can't remember all of them but they include Kona wine, mulberry, lupine, lilac, berry, jade green and cyan (all from Sew Fresh Fabric on etsy) and the background is Kona coal.
It's that lovely time of year when everything looks beautiful and green outside and people start thinking about pictures again....I've had quite a few photography requests lately, which I love, but it's obviously not really the best time for me to gallivanting about country roads with my camera (hello! still haven't unpacked our bags from our trip).... but when there's the most adorable, nicest-ever couple in your church, who just got engaged, you just have to make time. It was lovely fun to do this as a pre-wedding gift.
Easy Coins
I buy a guidebook to add to the collection (80p) and thank my companion for his time and knowledge. Pausing to admire the impressive yew tree just outside the south door – recorded as 15 feet in girth in 1793, and recently dated to over 1000 years old – I continue south along Church Lane, past the site of the wartime hospital, still recognisable from the old contemporary photographs my guide showed me. Then onto a bridleway across parkland – the grounds of Brockenhurst Park – home to impressive cedars, pines and wellingtonias, and a wide avenue of majestic limes.
Our fiction and our stories help us to understand the world we live in. Through it, we see things we’ll never see in real life, face problems and heart-wrenching decisions we’ll never have to face. Through our fiction we can understand life just a little better.
Jesus said, “A good person produces good things from the treasury of a good heart, and an evil person produces evil things from the treasury of an evil heart. What you say flows from what is in your heart.” (Luke 6:45)
The program is ideal for students wanting to make a mark in the luxury goods and services industry. It may be noted that the luxury market in India has witnessed robust growth of more than 20 per cent over the past year to reach $5.75 billion (Rs 30,607 crores). The Pearl Academy course would empower students to pursue career as luxury brand manager, luxury marketer, luxury store manager, luxury shopping consultants, publicity and luxury PR expert and luxury buyer/merchandiser.
The May 8 meeting will focus on preparations for the 2013 Confederations Cup and the 2014 World Cup in Brazil as well as scheduled events over the next two years, Rebelo’s ministry said in a statement.
b) 1934 series Federal Reserve System Bonds, Notes issued in 1928 , Kennedy Bonds ran into Quadrillions of US Dollars, Dragon Bonds are all recorded and acknowledged within the Green Hilton and Memorial Hilton Collective Agreements. Both Assets in the form of Bullion surrendered to the Global Accounts through the United States Government and then entrusted to a private corporation, the Federal Reserve System.
“Walking spirits are back! … With immense pleasure I present this compilation, long expected, although in this case, a dub delay it’s almost poetic … Deepindub is proud to present these artists, names well known to many, but not for all … and this is our mission to spread your music in the world.
i took this picture on instagram yesterday as were driving out of the parking garage at the hospital and because social media is a grand thing. with its faults. i experienced a steady stream of texts, calls, emails, fb messages, and encouragement all day in regards to the news we had just heard. we were thrilled to share with those of you that have walked through the past year and half with us or those of you that just "liked" my facebook status. thank you for that. there is something unique and humbling when people simply care. not because they should or because they have to but because they legitimately want to celebrate with us. that is a gift in our life. a huge body of believers and un-believers, friends and strangers and a far grander community of people around us than we may ever realize. thank you for celebrating alongside us. it makes all the difference.
The man, who has name suppression, was sentenced to six years in prison for the medals heist and sentenced to a further five years in prison for his role in a “mind-boggling” array of sophisticated fraud.
If upheld, the judgment would mean Hynix could owe damages and royalty payments on a big chunk of its annual $4 billion revenue in DRAM chips. The ruling is good news for Rambus, but it's just one of many legal cases involving its technology.
I'm going to go see if I can get my hunter up to level 62.
and mimes to watch.
The quick spread of nematodes is a product of propagating plants asexually. When you're not starting fresh with seed, and just using a piece of a parent plant, you're bringing all of its issues along with it, especially with farmers who share bulbs. True seed on the other hand produces a new generation, hopefully with improved traits and leaves behind all of the baggage like nematodes.
Today there are suitcases waiting to be unpacked and lots of laundry to follow once they are, but first, I think there might be some baking in my future. Believe it or not, we didn't overindulge on desserts on our trip, so no need to swear off treats here. I baked this chocolate bundt a few weeks before we left, and there's a good chance it'll be on the agenda again this weekend. The first cake was shared with my mom and her coworkers, the second will probably stay right here with us. This is a lightened up version of a traditional chocolate bundt - all of the butter has been replaced with vegetable oil, and some of the chocolate replaced with cocoa powder. It's still decadent (especially with the glaze), and definitely a good choice if you need a chocolate cake fix. I halved the recipe and made mine in a 6-cup bundt pan, the baking time was about 30 minutes. I loved the consistency and flavor of the coffee glaze too, though the instant espresso granules in mine didn't fully dissolve, which gave it a bit of a spotty appearance. The glaze would still be delicious without it, so I've noted the instant espresso as optional below.
Three piece San Francisco carry on with the Bay Area’s tradition of producing creative metal tinged music. Grayceon’s electric cello driven metal edged music grabbed our attention as the creativity was backed with great musicianship taking in and spitting out influences from all over the musical spectrum. We put some questions to Jackie and Zack.
The Arab, obviously impressed, drinks his beer, throws his glass into the air, pulls out his AK-47, and shoots the glass to pieces. He says, "In the Arab world we havr so much sand to make glasses that we don't need to drink with the same one, either."
In case you missed out on this story, the May Day rally in Kuala Lumpur was carried out in a peaceful and orderly manner last Tuesday.
I appreciate that kind of set-up and looked forward to the unraveling of these lies. What unfolds is a small family saga set around a Catholic home for unwed mothers. This location, with mothers constantly coming and going, provides the perfect background for Patchett to delve into this unlikely family, especially the tension of an uneasy mother-daughter relationship.
We give speeches to groups about gardening and things they can do to improve their gardens. We go to classes one night a week through the fall and winter, and then in the spring, after we graduate from the classes we become Master Gardeners. We have to put in 15 hours of volunteer time in the year, and we need to do 8 hours of classroom work to keep our status.
Website: I set it up last year as the place to find out about my books and me as an author. My url is karenjonesgowen.com, yay!.
I really despise the growing intolerance in this country for unpopular opinions. Either we all have free speech or none of us do, fires in crowded theaters notwithstanding.
Eliminate those 3 things… and watch the pounds melt off faster!
Anybody watching Dancing With The Stars? There is some great competition this year, but I have to give props to Donald Driver. And not just because I'm a Packer fan, but the guy is really doing well!
Taking the cue from these masters of outdoor light, I have started experimenting with both neutral density (ND) and polarizer filters to lessen glare and reflection. I also have been surfing the Web for tips and tutorials about filters. Professional photographer Paul Timpa has some excellent tutorials on his Facebook page, including one that focuses on filters. (Yea, okay, I know I’m a fiend for puns and alliteration – what can I say; it’s fun!)
* A German immigrant so tired of American customs, his wife, Rosie Ann said that “one day he got on his horse and rode away”
So I was surprised to find a little reminder of Olde New York inside the Times Square branch. I sat down with my Bird Dog and fries and saw this message burned into the long table: "Handcrafted in Brooklyn, NY, this surface was once part of a bowling late." No wonder the wood glows a bit. The tables are made by the DUMBO company CounterEvolution. There are apparently more bowling-lane tables in the Brooklyn restaurant. Where, I wonder, was the lane? What neighborhood?
I am delighted to announce that the super soaraway N E W Love and garbage on Sunday blog will hit the blogstands next week. After catching a glimpse of the vast piles of unsold copies of the new Sun Sunday in my local newsagents I see a clear gap in the market for a new Sunday publication with an independent agenda (and no articles by Toby Young).
a black flag with them skull and bones
One issue that came up over and over both by ourselves and by the UCU members was addressing this culture of fear that seems to have developed around protesting, the media sensationalises violence in protests in order to reinforce this culture of fear, by creating a moral panic and all together negative portrayal of protests it puts people of attending.
( ) Talk to him and try to calm him down.
After the last round of questions, and because there was nothing going on with the protest, and it stopped raining … I left without saying goodbye or waving or anything (music in headphones put me in another world….)
Fact is my reenactment of that infamous scene, (witnesses by my two good friends and a few cows), truly deserved an Oscar. My pitch was perfect, my vibrato strong & steady and my ballerina like elegance was unparalleled as I twirled for the heavens.
Wouldn’t it be amazing if a Canadian organization could do the same?
Abbaye de Leffe S.A. Leffe Blonde
A dentist, not allowed to look in your mouth
It's been some turn around.. I am quite stunned myself. I have cut T off completely. He is no friend of mine and he is trying to use kiddo as blackmail but it's not working. He created a lot of hassle during our weekend in Connemara. He told me last week that he refuses to have N overnight unless I am in the village. I told him that's just a really nasty attempt to control what I can and can not do. So I arranged for kiddo to stay elsewhere. Sunday he text her and told her she could stay with him and of course, her being a bit emotional after not enough sleep etc said she wanted to. There was a point when I had to ring him and yell over the phone - he knew damn well I was a good five hours journey away and powerless.
Eh, I think I'm done depressing you all. Bit of a short blurb of what is going on right now and why things haven't been so active here. I'll be catching up on everyone today, so look for me.
As always, welcome to all of my new followers and am so happy that you will be following me on this journey. I love getting everyone's comments, they really make my day.
Bob James and Joe Beck, too, have arranged their share of CTI classics. But it is David Matthews who came to define the last half of CTI's glory years, 1970-1978. Beginning in 1975, after a stint behind James Brown, Matthews was brought to CTI and almost immediately began to make a noticeable impact.
597 D-V/5/1970. “On the Occasion of Malcolm P. Sharp’s Second Retirement as a Law School Professor.” Law School Students Association, The School of Law, The University of Mexico, Albuquerque, New Mexico. See Item D-X/5/1980, below.
In the 16th century, the first polar expeditions to the Arctic first reported weather and sea-ice observations from high latitudes to which expeditions from the 18th century onwards added instrumental measured data from both polar regions. These early observations and meteorological data are essential to the investigation of climate change and global warming, because the ice cover of land and sea in high latitudes is very sensitive to variations of temperature and other meteorological parameters. Today these historic observations are used as proxy data for describing the climate of the past and the measured data are used as starting points for long-term evaluation.
RPB receives numerous emails from people interested in becoming dog trainers, particularly Pit Bull specialists. We thought it would be helpful to throw together a blog on some things to consider if you are thinking about embarking on the journey to become a humane, well-educated trainer.
Tread on a crack, sue the council.
Well I thought it might be forever on my back.
Tater Tot got his comb-through yesterday but that didn't stop him from demanding a little more today after seeing Sissy get it. Jessie Lee got combed upon arrival a few weeks ago and so far so good with her. Not too much shedding there yet.
So, Blogging. Kate Theimer knows a bit about blogging, so she’s an appropriate author for this Thing. I find her introductory remarks about the uses of blogging to be very helpful, in particular her discussion of what a blog can be good for and why the 23 things start off here. (I and my trail of dead or dying blogs particularly appreciate the bit about “Blogging is very easy to begin, but not so easy to continue”.) I am a little disappointed to not see discussion specifically of what a blog can do for Archives and Archivists in particular, but I assume we’ll get to it– this is pretty much the very basic stuff at this point. (The resources links at the bottom do include specific archival applications, so that’s a nice touch.)
Combine meats, onions & bell peppers and saute for a few minutes until onions begin to soften. Add Sauce and cook for a couple of minutes more to warm but no need to get super hot. Remove from heat.
Listen to the sound , listen to the sound…
Ultimately, the author’s conservatory teaches her an important lesson about embracing the changes life offers, and the risks that come with them. It’s a pragmatic view of hope, one that is believable and useful, if not so lofty or uplifting. Still, the book leaves one with the impression that the author is holding her subjects—and her readers—at arm’s length.
What do you do when your dog requires so much extra TLC?
Roman William Prendergast was born at 10.31am on Wednesday 2nd Feb (his due date). He weighed 8lb 4oz! and was 57cm long. He is super alert, stares a lot and I love him.
First of all, I set some pasta on to boil. Then I diced up 2 boneless chicken thighs and fried them in some olive oil with 1 chopped onion. I added some seasoning - plenty of black pepper, pinch of turmeric, pinch of cayenne and about 1/2tbsp paprika. I let that all fry off for about 10mins then added 6 tomatoes that I had chopped up in the food processor. I let the tomatoes heat through and then added the hot, cooked pasta. I left it for a few minutes on low heat for the pasta to soak up some of the juices. Mmmm, I could really go for some more of this now haha. Yummy!
Two months of the year (say, January and July), I swap with someone in Paris. Ideally, in the 2eme, 9eme, 10eme or 6eme.
this was after graduation. we did it! these are two of my friends from elementary school. i love how we reconnected during high school and hope we all work hard to keep in touch in the years to come.
2. SEVERAL times, too often to be a coincidence….we see severe weather (tornadoes , damaging winds, and hail) hit these area epicenters DIRECTLY or within 50 miles… and also it occurs approx. 48 hours of the high frequency being emitted from the ground based station (usually a ground based NEXRAD or similar).
Less than a week later, a five-man executive committee replaced Davis. One member of the new “office of the chairman” is Bienenstock. It’s ironic because he exemplifies Dewey’s business strategies that may have worked well in his case, but less so in others’, namely, lateral hiring and compensation guarantees. Prior to joining Dewey & Leboeuf in November 2007 (a month after the merger creating it), he’d spent 30 years at Weil, Gotshal & Manges. While he sat on Dewey’s management committee that Davis chaired, his new firm became one of the top-10 in 2011 lateral partner hiring.
But he LOVED it! And it looked great on him. Success! I would end this story with a vow of never again, but I have to go finish a drawing I promised someone. Even though I don't normally do custom portraits. Yeah, I know.
3 ring binder groups
You claim to wear the mask that grins and lies
Since the error corrected here was not clearly evident to one of skill in the art and the result of its correction was to broaden the claims, ACS should be granted summary judgment that the certificate of correction is not valid. The patent therefore continues to read as it did prior to the issuance of the certificate . . . Because the district court’s summary judgments of infringement and willfulness were both explicitly contingent on the validity of the certificate of correction, both of those judgments are vacated. On remand, the infringement inquiry should proceed under the original "osmolarity" versions of the claims.
Even the slums are beautiful
For Chappati :
A training backlog leading to the recruitment of RAF pilots. An aircraft that can’t keep up with training needs. An aircraft that is inferior to everything it will face. Discarding of ADATS. Discarding of AWACS. What will detect and stop the bombing of Canada? The Americans, we are Olive Oil to their Popeye? Sorry Uncle Sam is out of spinach and will rely more heavily on allies to protect US interests. Essentially NORAD is going to be a bloated bureaucracy to explain why Mexico scrambled fighters to protect Texas oil refineries.
Time has run out
He goes on to explain why:
On New Year's Eve in the year 1900, the Brooklyn Eagle editorial staff took it upon themselves to predict what the new century might bring. They came up with some surprisingly prescient answers, and a couple of real clunkers, albeit amusing clunkers.
1 1/2 tablespoons mild-flavored honey (I used clover)
Bad for the Jews? Pax Syriana.I Раис Харири – путь наверх Iran caught photoshopping missile test image US Congressman: ‘There is no two-state solution’ Starved of the Truth: New York Times Fails its Readers IDF Southern Command clears 5,000 dunams of landmines in Arava A DRAMATIC SURPRISE ON A QUIET SQUARE – ISRAEL by ROMSROOMS
ANSWER: Well here's where my beef lies. And here is where it gets interesting.
When I was 14 my family moved from Lewiston, Idaho to Bellevue, Washington. (Right outside of Seattle). We were only there for a short bit- My parents opened up a juice bar, Sunset Juice Bar. It was really awesome. I got to work side by side with my dad that summer. My mom stayed in Idaho so she could try and sell our house (it never did sell..... which was probably good, since we moved back to Idaho) I learned so much about my dad that I cherish. I love how hard working my parents are, and that they gave it their all to be successful in all they did.
(b) Their present.
i suppose you could say it's a bribe.
4. Slowly incorporate the egg white Mixture into the Flour mixture.
Any bets the answer has a price tag?
being treated as a joyous thing, part of life. Someone would pick
So as I got more scared, my dad was talking to my mom (who is a nurse) on the phone about what was going on. I feel so bad because I am sure he felt so hopeless. I finally told him to call 911. So many sweet people came over and offered help. One lady laid her hand on me and prayed for me. (Lady, if you read this, please comment. I have no idea who you are but you brought me so much peace!) Ambulance came and took my vitals. They said I seemed stable, but wanted me to take a ride to the ER just to be safe. Talk about embarrassing, being carried out of your fav store on a stretcher on a Friday night!
DT members must comment on half of the entries posted (DT is split into two groups and each group is assigned certain numbers)
“Something is wrong.”
I'm NEVER going to vacuum my dining room chairs again. Hip hip hooray!
Three kings’ walls to see yet,
***each number will equal 1 point (unless otherwise noted). Each point = 1 entry, the more entries the more chances of WINNING!
Gallo lies in Brooklyn’s Green-Wood Cemetery.
3-3-3-3-3-3-3-3-3-3 Perfect Pull Ups (Lengthen and Stretch, Nice even pulls, Change grip on each set) Alternating with…
Your fan for life,
Do funny. Okay, so a lot of us don’t have great comedic timing or fantastic impersonations or anything like that. But you don’t have to. Scalzi read the first few sentences from a prologue he spoofed on April Fool’s Day; the writing was hysterically awful and over the top.
I’m not ready Alice. You’ve thrust this upon me and I am so far from ready. I can’t let you go. I know I should love you enough to do that for you, to make you happy, but I always counted on the fact that I would be a part of your life, part of your happiness. I guess I’m too selfish to do this right. I’m sorry. I love you so much. Please. Come back to me.
El Paso County Sheriff Richard Wiles said in a statement that Valles was a career criminal and denied that Redelfs had mistreated inmates. Wiles stressed that the motives remain unknown.
Worst thing about it besides the fact that it pours from the above platform drainage system meant to pipe it away is that it showers almost completely in front of the stairwell leading to the exit. Now that the city is cutting down on the buses and leaving stops to become insta-relics can we at least fix the plumbing?
They were absolutely amazing throughout the whole process, and our driver on the wedding day was AMAZING! I'm so glad we decided to use Stillwater Trolley, and if you're in the MN area and looking for a trolley, I suggest you check them out too! :)
Sunday night took a little longer to get to bed but with the threat of having to go back to his room and sleep in his old bed we settled the fit down. And they both slept all night!!! Callie was cute as when I was telling him he would just have to go back to his old bed in his room she said but I don't want him to. He didn't either which worked out well.
I had a moment. I was reading a newsletter (aka blog post) all about women’s body image. And whilst, yes, towards the second half of the newsletter they were talking about the beauty of women being in their spirit, energy, self-love etc which is all super good stuff, for the first half of the newsletter they were highlighting all the things that could give you body issues eg what the media say, women’s propensity to compare how they look with each other, possible bullying at school etc. It was a way to empathise with readers, and probably did resonate with many people reading it. Yet of course, for some readers it would not be such an issue, and for others it may be exactly what they need to work on.
Then I started working in offices rather than restaurants, and was fortunate enough to rent an exurban house whose interior walls I was allowed to paint. I had a small yard, too. I enjoyed painting my walls jewel tones, slipcovering the furniture I bought at Goodwill to match, and planting strawberries. I was horrified to find myself spending weekends humming as I pulled weeds, but oh, those strawberries tasted so delicious. When I spooned some over sweet biscuits that I'd made myself, just as my step-grandmother used to do for me, I felt like an adult for the first time in my life. My friends began to hang out at my house and describe it as "comforting."
C) I didn’t accuse them of doing anything, the definition of libel (I know,I’m accused of slander but let’s pretend that whoever reported me made a simple typing error rather than not actually knowing the difference between libel and slander) is – “A published false statement that is damaging to a person’s reputation”. Now then, I didn’t state that they were doing anything that they weren’t doing. I said “Give me my money”, because I didn’t want to faff with forms, I just want the student loans process to be simple. I voiced an opinion on the website – perhaps crudely, and perhaps my language was less than appropriate, but I was under the impression that my Twitter was protected, and that only people who have requested to follow me can see my tweets. I discovered that this wasn’t the case (it sure as hell is now!), but it was a simple mistake – it was me, thinking I was having a private rant, venting my anger because I didn’t want to say it aloud in front of my brother and sister, but someone has taken it upon themselves to feel offended by it and report me.
Drake groaned and slid his hand into her hair, deepening the kiss. Simone sighed into his mouth, running her hands up the front of his shirt to grasp his shoulders. The feel of her touch was like a tonic to his deprived soul and he let out another groan, deeper this time.
When Mick Ward and his partners opened The Irish Embassy Pub in downtown Durango in 2008, it was a truly unique place within the context of the local bar scene.
something tragically beautiful
But, they argue, this alpha male is typically a rough character who learns to be tamed into kindness, kindness to her. Thus, you wind up with not only the strong silent cowboys with the soft interior life, but also these days vampires and werewolves and Vikings.
Inside of this building, you glance at the ceiling
“In and out O’Reilly. Make it quick!”, my commanding officer shouts at me through the thick bubble helmet.
Seriously now, 8 years ago I walked into one of the big furniture stores with one purpose. A king size bed with something in a dresser that matched. I ended up with the Godzilla of dresser sets. Oh yeah, I went whole hog. The bedframe, lowboy, highboy and matching nightstand. Oh, how I wish I could talk to that Dharma now….*sob*
and no one’s ever looked away, cause we know what you did, we know.
Delicate, from the loving hands
Apparently this has occurred to no one because our excellent public education system ensures that no American under the age of 60 has the slightest notion of this country’s history.
No visit to Wakefield would be complete without a look at the Chantry Chapel, which was built on the bridge over the Calder in the 1300s – it’s one of only three surviving chapels built on bridges in England. It’s normally locked apparently, but here we did strike lucky as it was about to host the World Women’s Day of Prayer and for once the doors were open to the public. What a little gem, and right across the road from the brand new Hepworth modern art museum.
I'm loving the trip we took last Friday!
Use the same blusher blush or a separate medium brush to apply highlighter. Apply highlighter above the blusher line in a c shape, just below the eye to above the ear. Bourjois Delice de Poudre have an excellent highlighter that gives a light luminescent glow that catches the light and doesn’t look to unnatural. It has the added bonus of smelling like chocolate! If you are not fond of highlighters, Benefit have Hoola powder that gives a nice finish to the cheeks.
Now sew your cone onto your headband. I sewed this by hand. I wanted mine to lean slightly off to the side, but you could just as easily sew it to the center. I lined the headband up to the center of the cone's width and used one pin to hold it in place. I then stitched the hat directly to the headband with just your basic stitch. I did this pretty tightly and folded the cone to the headband as I went so that there is no slop. And then you're done.
Today I saw a couple of them in the strawberry patch. Not long now until they are turkeys without borders!
nara-devatvam āpannaḥ
I know it now seems a bit desperate of me to go to a fortune teller to help solve a romantic dilemma, but at the time desperate blood pumped into and out of my desperate heart. I made up my mind to the see the seer.
They astonish you with strokes of the most sublime oratory….But never yet could I find that a black had uttered a thought above the level of plain narration….He is often happy in the turn of his compliments, and his style is easy and familiar, except when he affects a Shandean fabrication of words. But his imagination is wild and extravagant, escapes incessantly from every restraint of reason and taste, and, in the course of its vagaries, leaves a tract of thought as incoherent and eccentric, as is the course of a meteor through the sky. His subjects should often have led him to a process of sober reasoning: yet we find him always substituting sentiment for demonstration.
